My name is annette and this is my second blog site. I have been blogging for years but the last two have been a bit of a struggle for me as my husband geoff has been in hospital for a new knee.
Here is the latest version of the Gloria, made in shades of pink, by request.
The style of this DLC is very much tongue in cheek and is set up almost like a B-Movie in tone – with a wonderfully creepy voiceover and some great music.
This Psalm is often understood as the solitary cry of an individual sufferer. So Zorn and Tesh write, “The one who suffered is not the nation, but an individual, calling on his brethren, ‘the sons of Jacob,’ to join him in praising God (22-23). Of course, the nature of the psalm is such that it could, and would, be used to bring comfort to all the people in times of national distress. Yet in its origin it is a reflection of individual suffering. (The writer refers to his tongue, his jaws, heart, clothing, etc).” (College Press NIV Commentary on the OT, Psalms, vol 1, 203). That is fine as far as it goes, but it seems not to take into account the superscription which made this a Psalm for the congregation to sing.
FIRST - you must take a look at the "before" pics so that you can clearly see why a refresh was in order. Take a look (& try not to cry when you see the m-e-s-s).
One of the most important aspects of discipleship is interaction. We talk a LOT in this house. To be honest, it can be exhausting for an introvert like myself. Yet, there’s no way to shortcut the process. We’re filling the kids with information, and they have questions – good questions. Questions that often send us to do research of our own. In the process, we’re learning and growing as well. It’s a great process to be a part of.
i’ve wasted over 2 months of my life sitting here
It happens in a blink (x4)
(right after making out for about an hour, after a fairly successful date)
"Until now, online viewers have been able to watch TV with one substantial perk: fewer ads than if they watched the same show on TV...
The original game of Quidditch was substantially less physically exhausting, giving its magical advantages. “I always get asked, ‘How do you fly?’” Klump said with a laugh. Obviously, there is no flying, but players do run around the field on a broomstick.
I'm happy to say that all of my predictions came true.
We’ll build a trustworthy web-site where guests really feel comfortable using their credit cards
Hey there... here with a little card I made using Taylored Expressions Sketch challenge 157 and I made the card using all the items from my April Taylored Expressions Key Ingredients (I think one of the ribbons I used is from the March TE KI kit, though) kit! The only think that wasn't in the kit is the felt I used as a mat. The felt is from My Favorite Things.
Serendipity.
Shortly after Osama bin Laden was sent to meet his maker, Rush Limbaugh lambasted the guy’s housekeeping. On his show, Limbaugh noted that with three wives, you'd think Osama's house would have been a little neater, rather than strewn with rotten food, soiled linen, and dirty dishes.
The oyster stout is a good stout. It's a good beer. As expected, it's full of coffee and dark chocolate and looks to all the world like a confident contender. Matching it with a venison pie is a no-brainer, a routine operation. It goes in, gets the job done, comes out again.
When I came back to blogging, I noticed what seems like a shift in the connections happening across the web. Where before I had shared deep discussions with friends via blogs, I have noticed many people focusing instead on the much less personal Facebook or Twitter for their communications.
“Can I go, pleeeeaaassee?”
Still, there was enough for all of us. Thank you, Papa God, for the generosity and compassion of the people in this church.
I have been travelling; it's strange to return home to news of tornadoes in other parts of the country. But our travel day yesterday was relatively calm. Even the delays that we experienced on Thursday weren't as upsetting as they could be; I just settled in to read.
That takes a lot of getting used to. I don’t always get it right. But I’m learning that God prospers me when I follow His wisdom instead of mine.
here is the card
Thanks for the encouraging comments about my Rubber Room Renovations! I've got it all painted ...except for the baseboard trim. So it's getting there! A few of you asked me how to get paint in Stampin' Up! colors...It's super easy, just take a piece of card stock to Home Depot, or probably any paint center, and they can color match it for you. I actually wanted a color a little lighter than Certainly Celery, so I was lucky to find a color called Fresh Guacamole that was just perfect...only it made me crave guacamole & chips the whole time I was painting! Mmmm...see what I mean? Fast, get me some chips!
This is all coming straight from head to paper, so it’s still a fairly rough conception of ethics, but it’s a reasonable start. Here’s a quick review of important points to consider:
EXIT now and find out. Thank you.!
Killing Joke are much simpler and direct than Orchestral Maneuvers. They’re a straightforward guitar/ punk band that didn’t vary (at first) their unusually dense sound too much. By the late eighties and into the nineties, however, they started becoming a little too bombastic for my taste. Keep in mind 1980 Killing Joke is definitely “of the period”, meaning three-chord guitar nastiness that is satisfying in its striped down assault. If there’s a knock to be leveled against them it’s that now their late 70’s/ early 80’s output sounds a little dated. Not much melody in the songs, but hell – you could say the same about a lot of groups of the era.
And when I handed it back to him, "Can we go to my friend's house and give it to him now?" caught me by surprise.
ONE ~ Don't go to games. Stop giving Dolan your money. I know the chances of ever pulling that off are zero and none.
“Of course, the holy Scriptures, divinely inspired are self-sufficient for the proclamation of the truth. But there are also numerous works composed for this purpose by blessed teachers. The one who reads them will understand the interpretation of the Scriptures and will be able to gain knowledge he desires.” Gentes 1 (c. A.D. 350).
Lee Bains III & The Glory Fires’ debut album There Is A Bomb In Gilead hits shelves on May15th. The Birmingham, AL-based foursome have has been tearing up stages with their pals Alabama Shakes recently and will continue to tour throughout the summer and fall in support of their upcoming release, ‘There Is A Bomb In Gilead.’
“No, she’s a keeper. All mine.” With that, Andy started to run her fingers through Olivia’s long black hair. She then started caressing her neck and ran her hand up and down her cheek.
Dec. 5: "I AM THE CHRISTMAS SPIRIT" (my favorite Christmas poem)
Here's a jumble of things that are growing in my life right now- cucumbers, sugar pumpkins, burgundy beans, lots of lettuce. Tomatoes aren't doing spectacular but I'll take what I can get.
How much does this cost? Is there a bar near here?
While in college, I worked several random jobs to pay my way through school. I exercised a lot and figured I could become a fitness trainer since $20-$30/hr pay was great for a college kid and something I would enjoy doing. I took a few programs to get certified by the National Strength and Conditioning Association and was well on my way to training people.
Perhaps America's most effective UN Ambassador and nuclear proliferation expert John Bolton has a sobering and entirely accurate reading of President Obama's foreign policy...or rather, his non-policy. Bolton shows that the current occupant of the White House is essentially uninterested in foreign policy and national security, something I first theorized on these pages some time ago.
I've had a lot of bad sex in my time. I've also had some fantastic sex, but since I've written enough erotica to give Rick Santorum a heart attack three times over (yes, Mr. Santorum, women like porn), I thought it was time to give the other side its due.
Our salvation is by Christ and in Christ. By His righteousness we are made just. By His atonement our sins are forgiven.
Last weekend we went away to Umbria for the weekend to celebrate our Ruby Wedding Anniversary. We visited a number of the beautiful hill towns en route and spent a couple of days in Assisi. The plan was to this week write a post or maybe even two, about our trip and then for the end of the month produce one showing how the garden has been performing during April.
14. What do you like about your Mommy? (Daddy, sister, etc.)
Not mentioned by Gribben, but the best fictional take on his theory that I have read was The Number of the Beast by Robert A Heinlein in which four interdimensional travellers navigate through a multiverse with three spacial dimensions and three time dimensions, creating a total of six which can be raised to the par of six to the par of six... creating a multiverse based on the biblical number of the beast.
Before I go any farther I need to tell you that in no way am I giving medical advice. You should always consult with a doctor if you think you have any type of problem. I'm just a jaded parent of a child whose E.coli posioning was misdiagnosed.
2. Allowing the expression and encouraging the intellectual discussion of wrong ideas are equally good. Doing so re-enforces the correct ideas, and helps squash out the bad ideas so much more effectively. If the idea is wrong, proving it intelligently and publicly will better expunge the idea!
very humbling.
His years of memories provide a foil to the reputation for drugs that has stalked the Whiteaker for decades.
perhaps they're you?
Only the driver and Secret Service know what Obama emoted that fine March 2011 day. Did Malcolm’s son weep tears of joy, as he crusied that sweeping avenue – Lenox Avenue when Malcolm cruised it, which now bears his name as well? From his stately limo, did Obama drink in the sights and sounds, imagining his father behind a wheel, or striding along a sidewalk, or standing on a corner, rousingly speaking to crowds?
Over the course of these 4 weeks, I have talked about different ways that I have attempted to save water including:
So you have an idea for a beginning, a couple of middle parts and an end that have nothing to do with each other and you have no idea how to get from one to another? That's fine. It's way too early to panic and give up. It might be that you'll be working things out as you go along, just writing until you hit one of those key scenes. Or it might be that you never actually write any of those middle scenes because by the time you get to the middle you realise an event like that simply couldn't happen in the world you've created, or that your character just wouldn't act that way. The same with endings. You could be like J K Rowling and write the final scene seven books in advance and stick to it (yikes) or you could be like me and aim for that final scene as a guide but usually end up realising the actual events are all wrong, and it's just one or two things, like a character's feelings, or the location or mood that you need. Or you might be like Leah Clifford and have no IDEA how it's going to end (she's a better man than I am, Gunga Din).
Soon his friend wanted to leave, so we exchanged numbers, and I gave him one last long kiss and hug, and off he went.
I’ve ordered flowers for my mum and got my mother-in-law a lovely pack of lovely-smelling potions from L’Occitane for Mother’s Day.
Dalglish might alternatively opt to play more to Andy Carroll’s strengths. Liverpool currently set-up quite narrowly, with even the supposed wide players preferring to cut inside and play tricksy passes, rather than act as conventional wingers.
“It wasn’t always this way, you know. I was better than this.”
President Reagan was genuinely pleased to meet Melissa, and my sweet baby didn’t even squirm or cry. Sitting behind his desk, President Reagan signed Melissa’s baby book! He commented, “I must date this to make it an official document. President Reagan showed Dave and me the photos lining his bookshelves and reminisced about horseback riding alongside Queen Elizabeth. His eyes sparkled whenever he spoke about his wife, Nancy. President Reagan enjoyed speaking with Dave about world events and even invited us to sit down on a sofa for an extended visit. An aide entered the room to remind him of his schedule, but President Reagan remained seated and continued to share his childhood stories about growing up in Illinois. Pleased that both he and Dave had grown up in the Land of Lincoln, President Reagan reminisced about being a lifeguard in Dixon. After this incredible meeting, President Reagan walked us outside his office and gently touched Melissa’s cheek. “Goodbye, my little baby,” the 40th President said with a smile.
If one brought a bike, one could conceivably hurtle down the Westhills at ridiculous speeds after organic beer imbibation, angering old aristocrats and barons of industry in their mansion fortresses with fervent whoops and howls. Such activity would be reckless, illegal, ill-advised, but inimitably Portland. I do not condone such behavior.
First, the IDF experienced a major overhaul in tactics, training, equipment and leadership as a result of the 2006 Lebanon War, and they aren't going to be surprised again by Hezbollah, or sent into battle without a coordinated plan.
Thinking about how you relate to your characters will bring you closer to them, to understanding how they work, how they fit into your story and above all, who they are.
It was good that we checked. Our plan was to go the the Louvre on Tuesday, it would have been closed.
“We want to create the incentives to get the private sector do things they wouldn’t otherwise do,” explained Deputy Mayor for Economic Development Robert Lieber. “We want to use the resources of the public sector sparingly to create incentives for the private sector.” It was, he said, a question of risk and value.
When Something (note the intentional capital S...) happens, it's so easy to let it take over. And that's OK for a while, I think. We needed a few days to absorb what had happened. It was a minor injury, yes, but there was a shocking amount of blood (YIKES) and my little girl had this awful (oh it looked TERRIBLE) wound right above her eyebrow and I was so worried about how it would heal. There's so much to worry about, so many unknowns. When we don't know how that Something is going to turn out, it's so tempting just to shut down. How can we possibly think about keeping a house clean when we're so immersed in a really serious situation?
By the time I finish this post it will no longer be morning, so, Good afternoon.
Death – a card that is generally not on anyone’s list of favorite cards, IS a favorite of mine in this deck. I look at it, and I feel calm, peaceful, and in a very good place. White calls Death Tarot’s “memento mori”, that it is there to remind us that we are mortal, and to liv e a good life, to the fullest, because one day we will die.The imagery shows Morta the Crone, the cutter of the thread of life, giving our soul liberation. The threads of water are her radiating hair, while the flower is a traditional memento mori symbol, as flowers bloom only for a short time.
Texas has a huge prison system with more than 100 facilities scattered across the state. According to TDCJ, the average cost of operating a prison bed runs around $36 dollars per day per inmate.
If you are married with children, you probably knew this already. It is a well established fact among my mom friends that our husbands are the worst when they are sick. Sorry if that offend all the guys who read my blog (my apologies to both of you) but you guys are beyond useless when you are sick. I went from being married with two kids to being a single mom with three kids. While I melodramatically said I was dying, he really thought he was. All I wanted to say was, "Suck it up Buttercup, I'm sick too!" In the end, I knew it would be pointless. Plus I am collecting all kinds of bonus points for my sacrifices...and to be fair, he was/is realllllly sick.
3. Tax efficient planning
Time to put the fine young people at the heart of what we do in this country, because they deserve it.
This morning I realized that on days I'm not feeling real cheerful as I head to work, I keep hitting "Play" on my Hugh Laurie blues CD, "Let Them Talk".
by Bryan Murphy
Shadow!
And the Top Three are:
Virgin Blue says it stopped serving the wraps after complaints from customers.
4) Hopefully it’s still really hot at this point. Take a mouthfull, and gargle/swish the salt water everywhere, especially on the sore. This will hurt. Do this as long as possible. Do this until there’s no heat left in the water.
Dear Parents, You should worry about who your child's friends are, because his friends will be very influential in his life. His friends will have an affect on his self-esteem, his eating habits, his chances of doing drugs, and lots of other important things. You should combat this possible negative influence by trying to be influential in your child's life. But you must do this while never attempting to be your child's friend. Don't ask why. Trying to talk about it will only make us angry. So just don't do it. Good luck. Sincerely,
To make the situation worst, university students were offered RM300 per person to attend.The below tweet speaks for itself
Based on insight from these more experienced local permaculturists, I’m starting to realize the same thing is likely true of a number of other things I’ve planted, such as my olives (though I always knew those were a long shot). I was also informed that I shouldn’t be surprised that my tan-oaks are doing so poorly, since apparently – though they grow in a wide range of environments in our region – they grow almost exclusively on “native” soils (those derived directly from the bedrock underneath) and not on alluvium (or, by extension, the marine deposits I’m sitting on). I also should not expect my Oregon white oaks to do very well, since they’re more common somewhat inland. So much for acorns. Apparently my precious hazelnuts are really about the only nut I can expect to possibly do well here.
I wasn’t, and I didn’t. I had two young children. I worked from home. I rarely socialised. My idea of a day out was doing the big shop in Tesco.
good .... Soph now has the keys to her flat and its been all systems go to try and get her in within two weeks..
My first rock concert was at Hershey Stadium. My friend took me to see the Who (before John Entwhistle died) and there was a little stand selling custom tags. So I bought one to make a memory of my first concert.
On Monday we ran a slow, but faster than last time, 2.5 miles. Just a there and back run in the cold sunshine. The sun was shining, but there was a cold wind blowing.
Marguiles
Usually we tend to let go of pleasant emotions and cling to the unpleasant ones; 99 percent of the world population is prone to doing this. But when the consciousness becomes free and cultured with meditation, this tendency of holding onto negative emotions is the first thing to disappear. We start living in ‘‘the moment’’ and let go of ‘‘the past’’. This is important because no matter how good the people we interact with, there are bound to be misunderstandings in any relationship. Once a little misunderstanding crops up, our emotions get distorted and a host of negativities follow. But if we are able to let go and focus on the ability of consciousness to revel in the glory of every moment, we are shielded from all the above. The truth that every moment is supportive and complimentary to our growth dawns on us. Thus, attaining higher states of consciousness does not require any complicated strategisation; one just needs to learn to let go.
I evenly spaced out each piece of foam board onto the pallet,
For infantry, I´ll put mainly a figure per 20×20 space. This means I´ll put one figure in a 20×20 base and two in a 40×20 base. Easy, right?
Old stuff out. New stuff in.
The American Widow Project is a non-profit organization dedicated to the new generation of those who have lost the heroes of yesterday, today and tomorrow, with an emphasis on healing through sharing stories, tears and laughter. Military Widow to Military Widow.”
(Which is why, while I’m all for churches using the Internet, I also think, aside from a basic, informative, well-designed web page, social media should probably be way down on a typical parish’s to-do list. If you have someone who’s into it and knows what they’re doing, set them loose. I think a diocese should definitely have a communications person who’s savvy with social media. But otherwise….remember MySpace, calm down and give the liturgy, catechesis and works of mercy more time.. Don’t need a full-time Twitter Apostolate or Pinterest Ministry team just yet.)
got you a little confused there for a while, didnt i ?
"There are few things more enjoyable than watching bookish types acting catty, so it is with some glee that I have been following the row that has broken out between the critic John Sutherland, the novelist and uber-blogger Susan Hill, and an as yet unnamed literary editor of a national newspaper."
Vocals performed by Vita & Ashanti.
It's in this context that even the most hazardous and stupid-minded of long-shots on the part of Aaron's characters become somewhat if not entirely understandable. It may be completely impossible to see how Dash's affair with Carol can ever end in anything other than a great deal of trouble and blood, and yet it's also immediately obvious that they're two broken individuals grasping for anything which might make something more of their blighted, alienated lives.Of course they're inevitably going to invite even more disaster into their lives, for what else do they have to live for except for the moment between aiming themselves at calamity and it arriving? In these circumstances, even Krystal's crack habit becomes as understandable as it's an obviously catastrophically bad choice - to say the least - for her and her unborn child. If the surface of Scalped appears at times to be profoundly Old Testament in the way in which eyes and teeth are returned with compound interest one for the other, then its sub-text is often tellingly Old Testament in its essential compassion and reluctance to judge without sympathy. None of the cast are portrayed in a way which means that they can dodge responsibility for their actions with a cry of "society's to blame", and yet, it is too.
Hope everyone's having a great week!
in what one of those magazines I no longer read
There is a difference in asking for advice or having to sit and listen to unsolicited advice..don’t be afraid to ask, and don’t be afraid to modify any advice given!
A mysterious stranger with a harmonica joins forces with a notorious desperado to protect a beautiful widow from a ruthless assassin working for the railroad in this long frontier epic. Mysterious pasts and the strength of loyalties is explored amid lightning fast gun battles and stylish vistas.
Another noteworthy finding from his research are the generally below-average achievements of students with an Islamic background.
Maia's lunch: Toy Story pasta w/broccoli & Daiya cheese; applesauce oatmeal cookie; honeydew melon.
Grievance and/or arbitration option for discipline
Many of these 1950s contacts occurred in the US and Canada, and were studied and compiled by Wilbert B. Smith – a Canadian government worker with classified clearance.
- December 1968 meets Hare Krishna devotees for first time
as they ride on jet skis.
But Col. Ripley was also a Wounded Warrior. His injuries from Vietnam led to his death in 2008. So yesterday, the participants included civilians, Naval Academy midshipmen, active duty military, veterans and Wounded Warriors ran and walked in honor of a Wounded Warrior, to raise funds to help fellow Wounded Warriors.
Reflections from the Saints
A few examples:
12) Muzzle
Her work was featured in the magazine, because she recently finished decorating one of her parents homes.
Colin Firth won. This was no surprise what so ever. He should have won last year for A Single Man though.
JOHN’O'DRISCOLL: Tell you what, Chris?
With his head held up high
Today starts a new Creative Monday Challenge! This time it will be an "Anything Goes" challenge. Don't you just love an Anything Goes challenge! I do.
Into the Woods to Operation Petticoat. There is no pattern I can see.
THE PAPER SHELTER
99. The Cleaners From Venus-The Stopping Train (Kool Kat)
And so it was that on their way out of town on Friday afternoon they happened to hear a story about the extraordinary efforts to rebuild and reopen the damaged section of the Pentagon within a year after the attacks. In the middle of the story, which featured Walker Lee Evey, a modest, genial-sounding fellow who managed the reconstruction project, they glanced out the car window and realized they were driving past -- the Pentagon. They marveled at that weird bit of synchronicity and went on their way. On the return trip Sunday evening, they listened to a selection of StoryCorps' 9/11 tributes and recollections. The stories are captivating, of course, recording with gut-wrenching specificity the individuality of lives lost and survivors struggling to carry on. They listened intently to one particularly powerful account by Beverly Eckert, whose husband Sean Rooney spoke to her for more than 30 minutes from the 105th floor of the World Trade Center until the collapse of the building cut off the call and his life. As Eckert's narrative ended, the dulcet-voiced reporter picked up the story -- with the tragic update that Eckert, who became a prominent advocate for those affected by the attacks, was killed in a plane crash in 2009 while flying to an event to honor her late husband. Both Moms gasped as they took in that painful detail, and as they struggled to absorb it the car rounded a curve -- and there again, across several ribbons of highway and in the soft light of a sweet late-summer evening, was the Pentagon.
Value : CustomDumpFlags
On the "Fairy" bag I have used more candy, and one of my favorite Lindsay Mason "Funstamps", called Dotty Flower, I just love this and use it all the time. It is quite large and very detailed, and really easy to stamp and cut out.
Are you fucking serious?
Your grace
Then, every time a teenage girl made a painfully insecure remark on how fat or ugly she felt, a group of Christian girls would chant, “PROVERBS 31:30!! PROVERBS 31:30!!” in her face. (“Charm is deceptive, and beauty is fleeting; but a woman who fears the LORD is to be praised.”) It was less of an encouragement to fear to Lord, and more of a social chastisement for seeking compliments. It was thrown at me a few times when I had voiced genuine fears or concerns, in the place of sympathy or love.
weeks ago that I was going to start posting recipes & sharing their points.
He called the exterminator, who said he would be right out. The exterminator arrived in a van, hopped out, and opened the door. He took out a large net, a shotgun, and a fierce-looking dog.
As for my November update, I discovered that I've mostly been cooking! So this month's 101 update will be a "tasty Tuesday." Party in my mouth!!
Next week I will feature some of your challenge entry cards!
The Ginger is made from a scrap of brown kraft wrapping paper. Same for the start and I also made a heart. Punch tiny holes and add a hanger for your tree.
“So, Isaiah, are you ready to tell me the ‘other’ reason for leaving the gate unlatched?”
Beyond Babel: How does DSC propose to empower the marginalised?
Catla is only 13 years of age but she must decide whether she will accept an offer to marry the bossy pedlar, Olav, who cares little for any ideas except his own. This is the decision she is mulling over while collecting plants on the heath away from her village of Covehithe in Northumbria. But, after detecting vast smoke from the village, that deliberation is quickly put aside as she runs to Covehithe to observe the village being burned by Vikings, a.k.a Nord-devils, and the villagers being herded towards the goats' pen. Daughter of the headman, Athelstan, and former warrior Sarah, Catla gathers her courage to seek help in Aigber, the village a day's walk away.
Stolen Sunday is a young company based out of San Francisco. We launched in the early summer of 2011 with awesome success at the Outside Lands music festival. Since then the momentum behind the company has been unstoppable. It seems like every week we are in new stores and we are lucky to have an awesome an interested crew of scarf and scoodie lovers who support us. It seems like people are ready to get behind the carefree fashion and fun-loving vibe that Stolen Sunday embodies.
You will also noticed I fixed the search functionality and moved it up higher on the sidebar so it's easier to find!
we turn him on. He
I trust You.
I now make it a staple of my public talks on energy to ask who in the audience has been to Europe. Usually many hands rise. I then explain that Americans seem to love to get on a jet plane, cross the Atlantic, and spend time in a theme park called Europe where good meals abound; interesting and usually friendly people reside; and beautiful, historic cities and breathtaking countryside are everywhere. What they may not know is that by American standards Europeans live in an energy-starved society where the per capita energy consumption is only half that of the United States.
each 2 1/4 x 12" for handles
But you hate to see me cry, hate to see me sad
It was important to us because 35 years ago on that day, 2 very young and ambitious kids, stood toe to toe with trembling knees, in front of God and their families, gripped each others sweaty hands, looked into each others tear-filled eyes and told each other with soft, quivering voices that from that day forward, they would love, honor and cherish each other, till death do us part.
The theme is "black , white and another colour"
3. Rich content
let freedom ring.
afraid of goals set beyond the highest heights.
....from word verification!
-basic editing
Now ecclesiastical authorities in Rome, after liaising with the Vatican, have said they will ‘not oppose any request from police to have the tomb of Mr De Pedis opened and examined and his body moved.’
I don’t have to be perfect. I just have to be.
I swear there is some hypnotic power in that bullseye.
As it was, I had to maintain near-complete sobriety so I could make it into work this morning. I compensated by drinking approximately 12 cups of water, which has its own set of rewards (no hangover) and risks (multiple trips to the nationally-renowned Emo's bathroom).
As the room spins, you tell your kids “I can only go so fast! Stay out of the kitchen while I’m cooking. The stove is hot. You kids are in my way. Don’t get under me.”
I just painted with it yesterday, I'll finish the pieces today.
For a side dish, I made roasted asparagus because it is yummy and so easy (plus requires very little clean up). Asparagus is in season right now so eat up while it is tasting it’s best and easy on the wallet. For the asparagus, I cut off the bottom 3 inches because it can be tough and then put the asparagus on a foil lined baking sheet. I turned the edges of the foil up slightly to prevent any liquid from running all over my oven. In a small bowl, combined the juice of 1/2 a lemon, 2 tbsp olive oil, 1/4 tsp salt and 1/2 tsp. garlic powder. I then drizzled the mixture over the asparagus and put in the oven. If you make the fritatta with the asparagus put in the asparagus when you turn the oven up to 425. This way both things will be done at the same time.
— Support the open exchange of views, even views they find repugnant.
WHAT SHOULD I KNOW ABOUT THE COOL-JAMS FACTORY?
One of the first things I noticed about Alex when we met ages ago was his dimple! It's pretty subtle but it's there and I adore it!
Now I see and I feel,
Last time you laughed: morning
but so does my spirit! It is remarkably liberating
In order to do this with any degree of effectiveness, these proponents will tell you, there needs to be some measure of control.
.count the basies
Next week we will look at Myth #1 – Arminian Theology Is the Opposite of Calvinist/Reformed Theology.
And do you know what else this means?!? We've unwittingly invented the perfect weapon!
5) Not only is Mika the best musician in the world (or one of the best, anyway), he. Is. Adorable. Every time I hear his songs I grin like an idiot and every time I see him I grin like an idiot too. All right, so the latter is a bit far-fetched, but really, come on:
The remainder of the semester continued without incident, and I was able to reclaim my "party master" position in the community soon after the clean up had come to a close. I could now go back to throwing carousals without various guests having to step over a river of shit in order to use my restroom. But, summer was well on its way and it was time to move out of our detestable domicile for good.
But back to the TV show in question. As the programme rolled on, I couldn't help but feel for Jamie. Not to feel sorry, but feel for him as a person. He's young, wants to be true to himself and although he was okay with being openly gay, that last step on the glittery staircase in f*** me pumps seemed a little too much. Yet - bless 'im - he did it all in spades and what brought a smile to my face, was that a) his friends were with him, and b) when push came to shove with the School saying it going to the prom in drag wasn't fully appropriate, so the rest of the year seemed to rally to support him too. Was there an element of teenage 'sticking it to the Man' in that? Perhaps, but then with social conformity and other such pressures, I found it very cool to see the School back down and just let him be. To stick your neck out at that age; the midst of your teenage years when you are tagged by your actions, seemed - to me at least - incredibly brave.
514210 Data processing services
Of course, Luke, Ariel I aren’t the only sick kids in class. So when they go to class, they pick up germs from other sick kids who are in class and then everyone brings them home to share with their family/roommates. And the cycle begins again.
So this week's challenge is to make a Vintage Love card. I'm not really a vintage girl ~ so I do "fake" vintage.
I was part of a panel of Paris-based authors for an event at the UK Embassy called Writers At The Residence. Organised by UK Ambassadress, Lady Westmacott, to raise funds for the excellent local charity organisation, SOS Helpline, the event also featured fellow scribblers Heather Stimmler-Hall (Naughty Paris Guide), Alex Lobrano (Hungry for Paris), Stephen Clarke (A Year In The Merde), Charles Timoney (A Certain Je Ne Sais Quoi) and Michael Sadler (An Englishman Amoreux).
David Suzuki laments Tory-imposed ‘chill’ on green groups
Wait… Hey! Where’d you go?
Hope everyone is having a good weekend.
Citing the lyrics of a poem that Common recited during an HBO appearance, Sean Hannity, Sarah Palin and even the New Jersey State Police have all joined the chorus of voices depicting the emcee as “dangerous,” “controversial” and a ghetto “radical.” In fact, he is none of these things. Common, a Chicago-native formerly known as Common Sense, is — as far as these things go — a socially conscious lyricist who has toiled in relative obscurity for most of his career, and to some degree, still is overshadowed by his far more flamboyant and ignorant colleagues. He is what used to be called a “backpack rapper,” meaning that your white, pot-smoking college roommate would be exponentially more likely to find him interesting than would any gun-toting thug on the street. To criticize him as some diabolical “threat” to God-fearing, law-abiding Americans is both disingenuous and willfully blind to the overall body of his work.
Him: Three bags of trash by your car?
Dang nabbit...
I’ve often had people in my Mastermind groups who are struggling, looking for the answer, hoping to find the right formula … and looking everywhere but within. It isn’t uncommon for someone to lay their troubles at my feet and say, “What would you do, Rémy?” I could tell them what I would do, but that would be imitation. And then you know they’d come back to me and cry out, “It didn’t work! What did you leave out?”
Radwaste - Cooking and Nothingness (Happy Squid)
Eating with others I always worry about the cutlery; will I know which fork to use? I once went to a wedding and accidentally stole the brides fork. I had never met the bride before, nor had such a fancy meal. I get obsessively angry about table manners. My brother used to eat with his mouth open in a deliberate attempt to wind me up. It worked, if I have to eat with someone who chews with their mouth open they must have thick skin and therefore not notice the murderous glances I throw them across the table.
I am going to frame it for Lila's room. Should I made more for each skating season?? Hmmm, maybe.
Drachen - Here also be Vikings and their ilk.
Documentation/more pictures
When it comes to watching rubbish on the telly, I have to confess to quite liking Strictly. There’s the odd tasty lass in it, oh and Ann Widdecome. Not sure who the most fanciable one is yet, but Kara Tointon, Michelle Williams & Tina O’Brian all get my vote. If I was inclined to vote, which by and large I am not. I have a suspicion the votes of this household will be going to Gavin Henson, as the squeezes pick.
~Dustin
A tense opening half hour soon becomes a plodding unpleasant affair with few redeeming features. A cool P.I turning up to get to the bottom of the group’s disappearance provides little relief from the gloom.
The rest of the chapters kind of go through different things you can do to help prepare for the baby. And if I’m going through this book along with the pregnancy, usually the stuff that gets brought up is a month or six late. Like in the seventh month chapter, they talk about baby names. Do people really wait till the seventh month to start thinking about names? Karli’s got both boy and girl names picked out for Squatch already. Has for a while. And for the next couple kids. A little late to the party, aren’t we Mr. Brott and Ms. Ash? And besides, there are countless other baby name books and websites already. Can’t you bring something original to the table?
“It’s me now, Tank, just you and me. Your old pal gave you to me.”
I have been having so much fun making all these Peachy Awesome Projects. Me and my Fiance just had our 9 year anniversary a little over a week ago. I made him a card already but had the thought to make an "I Love You" card for one of my projects. I'm really happy about how it turned out.
Class: Champion
Contemporary Western Worldview
South Africa needs to create 10 million jobs in the next 10 years to become a normal country, economist Mike Schussler said on Thursday.
“For goodness sake either dock the shuttle or stop it!”
Shadows crept across the wall. I tried to ignore them. I failed.
I've read Slate for years at this point. I know who Farhad Manjaoo is. Also, the title was enticing enough for me to click over. Honestly, I knew it was going to touch upon the hashtags that get really popular in black circles on Twitter. However, this is assumed because Twitter doesn't compile demographic info. Honestly, just because someone puts up a picture of a black person as their Twitter picture, can you really be sure? No. But I really don't doubt the data that there are a lot of blacks who use Twitter. On some level, we're having fun with it.
Who ever stood in the path of twirling passions
"Uh-oh," I told her in my cartoony mom-voice. "That doesn't belong in your mouth."
Proudfoot described the experience of teaching ab initio Italian at an English university and suggested that ab initio students reach a higher level after four years than post A-level students. She proposed a variety of reasons for this and focused in this article on evidence that ab initio students do well if grammar is taught in context using a functional approach.
Conditions can make you trust
I was hooked.
At some time thereafter, and without prior notice or warning, there did occur upon the unimproved real property adjacent and appurtenant to said House (i.e., the lawn), a certain disruption of unknown origin, cause, and/or circumstance (said disturbance was later described by the residents of the House as "a clatter"). The party of the first part did at that time immediately rush to a window in the House to investigate the cause of said disturbance.
All of this is delivered with the articulate candor of an author comfortable with both her own intellect and the subject she’s romanticizing. Luckily, even if you’re not a history buff, even if you pay not one lick of attention to politics, you will still find yourself entertained by Vowell, because she manages to be both ridiculously smart and a self-deprecating “everyman” who is infinitely relatable and accessible.
Taking place in year 2012: righteous year
This is the lesson that ANC President Jacob Zuma should also take to heart when he hails Obama's victory. But judging from the statements emanating from Zuma himself, as well as his family and the ANC, it seems the real insights escape them. They are still bound by the shackles of race, and see everything through a racial lens. They see Obama's victory as a racial victory.
In the absence of a clear stamp of children’s play, I think that we can help spark things off by creating a sense of the surreal, of objects that are eager to be transformed. Things that are upside down, out of place – these signal that you have entered a place where usual rules don’t apply. They say: this is a place where a table can be a table, but it doesn’t have to be.
What do you think? Are there different stages of love? What are your stages? Do you find that you are like me, easy to say that you love just about anyone, but you take romantic love so much more seriously? Please share your thoughts in the comments.
So whether your buying Botanicula in the bundle or purchasing it solo… don’t miss out on this highly addictive adventure. Just make sure to keep an eye on the clock, as I bumped my bed time back an hour or so last night when I lost track of the time playing this wonderful little adventure!
Recommended for those who like a healthy dose of angst and politics mixed in with their romantic comedies; bonus for fans of Kim Sun Ah and Cha Seung Won, both of whom look hella beautiful throughout (though Kim’s perm is kind of a creature unto itself for the first half).
Ms. Shopping Golightly
Quinoa Salad with Cilantro and Cukes
Women, like all human beings, are entitled to full human rights
the fun as well and here is what they created for the challenge....
UPDATE: I am feeling better now. I have worked out my argument with the person with whom I argued and suddenly I am aware that I am NOT a lazy person. Also, the sun is shining! Yay! Softball!
In Hong Kong, very few mainland Chinese can obtain Hong Kong PR even after living there for several years. However in Singapore, there is no minimum period of residency before a prospective immigrant is qualified to apply for PR leading to many Chinese bus drivers, construction workers, hawkers, masseurs and even freelance prostitutes getting Singapore PR and citizenship.
I don’t have a lot nicknames. I have noticed lately at my new job that people are itching to shorten my first name. I’m not sure why. It’s not like its hugely long or difficult to pronounce.
Preheat oven to 400 degrees. Spread brussels sprouts on a rimmed baking sheet. Drizzle with 2 Tbsp olive oil, salt, and pepper. Stir around until well combined. Roast for about 20-30 minutes, stirring once partway through, or until they are crispy on the outside and cooked on the inside. Remove from oven and set aside.
Then tell me why is it that nothing much
I exhibit these stages when the children are away**, (see below if you fancy an insight into the times when they are here) and I think I do okay, (even if I do say so myself), when they are around to be as normal as I can be. Don't laugh- I can be normal! The stages look something like this:
The reader is tossed into Kate’s life and into this unusual world without a word of notice. I enjoyed this fast paced writing. The plot was very well done. I bought into the plot, and just like Kate, felt stupid for not identifying the guilty party right away. Each scene is great filled with action, while crucial to the plot, and you would be truly lost if you were to skim.
I’ll be changing some things in the blog, as well, to reflect the fact that everything here can be used in both RMVX and RMVXAce.
After I was baptized, a family member asked me, “Aren’t you glad you’re not going to hell?” I admit I did feel better, but I wondered what kind of magic water it was that could get me a “Get out of Hell Free” card. Below the surface I still didn’t have peace, and I still feared death.
Meanwhile, in protest, I'm using alternative search engines like Yahoo and Bing instead of Google.
The Treasury said nearly 500,000 public sector jobs could be expected to go. An independent assessment of the Scottish public sector suggested it could expect to lose about 60,000 jobs, and another report for Pricewaterhouse Coopers suggested up to 35,000 more could be lost in private firms dependent on public spending.
Diane tried not to look horrified. “Sounds great!” The extent of her experience with Japanese food included tempura, California rolls and teriyaki. She was much too embarrassed to mention that…especially now.
SW: How do you view newspapers that do not have branded-type editions audited?
4) A species or subspecies known to science but allegedly existing as an artificial occurrence (i.e. due to human intervention) in a location outside its scientifically-recognised geographical distribution (e.g. alien big cats in Britain).
Stamps: Blessings by Mark's Finest Papers
Who is generously offer a prize of a $20.00 Gift Voucher to the winning random commenter.
When I was writing Traitor’s Kiss, this little nursery rhyme kept popping into my head, because I was thinking about sugar and spice in the sixteenth century:
Chest colds are dangerous for people on Enbrel. One of the side effects of this RA drug is that it predisposes us to a deadly form of pneumonia so, needless to say, I was very concerned that this bronchitis would turn into pneumonia and knock me flat for weeks or months. Marathon training aside, this would put a serious crimp in my life and that of my family. If I were hospitalized and the doctors here decided they could not meet my medical needs, my daughter and I would be sent back to the States and my husband would have to finish out the rest of his 3 year commitment in Korea alone. My motivation to stay as healthy as possible is very high indeed! In addition to treating my illness I also have to stop taking Enbrel to allow my immune system to be as strong as possible; this sets me up for a whopper of an RA flare.
Europe Version 2CDs (2011/2/4)
went under unsold im told!
I've never liked saying goodbye, who doesn't afterall, especially if it's to the person you dearly cherished like parents, dear friends, families, it's never been a pleasure. I've had my fair share of tears at the airport for a few years back saying goodbye to my parents and loved ones when I used to travel back and forth between states and countries, and you would think that I would get use to it after some time, but I didn't. I don't travel much anymore, and if I do, it is for a vacation, so it's a whole different story.
CR: 20mph zones were presented as in the public interest. I was sceptical. But I did not oppose it as a pilot project.
It began simple enough, with common sense questions I began to ask myself. The guys at work knew me as someone who liked the finer things in life, frugal yes, I would get the best deal on the finer things in life, but none the less, the labels mattered to me. One day, I sat looking at the watch that had started it all, the most expensive one I had ever purchased. Christmas was coming up, things were tight and I felt like a real self centered jerk walking around with a $2300.00 watch on my wrist that did nothing a Timex wouldn’t. Oh, true it was good to 300 meters on a dive, problem was, no humans were good for 300 meter dives, so when the submersible recovered your body, it’s pilot would at least get a nice watch in the deal. I grabbed my camera and began taking the pictures for E-bay, I was sad to see it go, but I could no longer justify the luxury, besides, I still had my collection of Seiko automatic dive watches anyway. They weren’t Omega, but they did keep time, and cost less than a quarter what the Omega did. Sigh, I clicked “list”.
So perfect for vintage style, carnival & barn style weddings, your guests will love the idea!
Lord Tebbit is correct, at least in terms of the BNP's economic policies. This is evident from even a cursory glance at the party's website which endores the 'renationalisation of monopoly utilities and services', it elaborates:
Just what it was
“Deep tissue,” like most terms in the woolly world of massage therapy, has several meanings, none of them very precise.
The examining division had objected against the unity of multiple independent claims and had won the impression that the applicant would not be willing to react on these objections during oral proceedings. This impression was based on the resolute position the applicant took during the procedure in writing. As a consequence, the oral proceedings were considered not relevant to the case.
Such a plan, which seems to be an acknowledgement that the company cannot be rescued as a going concern, would still have to overcome the issues I identified at (a) to (f) above. Otherwise Rangers Football Club PLC will be wound up.
Not available online
“Isaac, that’s enough. Let Isaiah finish his explanation.”
And when your enlarged heart holds that very first grandchild for the very first time, and that big, womanly, motherly heart of yours begins to wring itself out, raining down torrents of love through your happy tears -
Through it all...mothering, as hard as it is...still gives a blessed chance to every now and then sneak a bite or two from some fabulous creation. Yes! I said sneak. I actually took this photo of this dessert, the other night, while it was hiding in my kitchen cabinet, or else I'd be sitting high and dry without nearly so much as a nibble.
In the past 72 hours, while I’ve struggled with work, school, my kids’ schedules and a migraine, a great exodus has taken place among Rush Limbaugh’s national advertisers after his abuse of law student Sandra Fluke for trying to stand up for basic health-care rights for women. I won’t rehash the merits of the issue, which by now are pretty well settled among those with ears to hear. (I’ve tweeted about it a bit if you want to go look.)
Ego-separation also creates a sense of incompleteness. Because we’re separate from the world, we’re like fragments which have broken off from the whole, and so feel a sense of insufficiency. There’s a kind of hole inside us which we spend most of our lives trying to fill (but very rarely manage to), like cats who were taken away from their mother at birth and who are always hankering for affection and attention to try to compensate for a sense of lack. Born-again Christians mean something close to this when they say that there is a ‘god-shaped hole’ inside us – although in my view traditional religion can’t fill the hole either, only provide the same (ultimately incomplete) consolation as wealth or success.
Allen is no stranger to controversial comments. Whilst playing in Haikou, China last year he tweeted ”Dead cat found this morning, Any wonder this place stinks. Must be dead cats all round the town.” He continued and called the Chinese people “ignorant” and that the place was “horrendous”.
Apologetics, then, is the reasonable defense of Christianity anytime, anywhere, to anyone, using whatever material is suitable for the occasion not and is just for an elite group of scholars.
Sent: Sunday, March 25, 2012 2:02 PM
Good morning everyone hope you are well and having a nice weekend ?
Kowalski
Here's a news flash for you.........
And though the pain is an ocean,
To the surprise of observers at a Westminster lunch, the Labour veteran declared that the death of the world’s most notorious terrorist had ‘appalled’ him.
We didn’t get the run under one this time – important support held quite strongly. It’s now time to see where the real resistance is for the Aussie in the next little while.
“Yesterday, as we watched the procession for five to six hours, it was visible that the people of Malaysia are challenging the shadow of fear.”
I know - the title of this blog is definitely not politically correct - I almost put a disclaimer on here that said if you are Sharla Miller please do not read this!! (because of Sharla - a skin cancer survivor - I vowed never to go to a tanning bed again!) however - I didn't promise to stay out of the sun.... sorry Sharla!!!
Isn't that what is great about trials? They really do make us stronger if we keep going...if we keep climbing. By nature I am quite a lazy person. I prefer the ground and the easiest way from point A to point B. Thanks to a father who likes spending time in the great outdoors, I have been on many a mountain in my lifetime where I have stopped along the way and wondered why I was still going up. It seemed pointless and stupid. I had a bad attitude. I was tired. I was aching from the strain. But I knew that quitting wasn't an option. So I continued on. Huffing and puffing. Creeping along at a snail's pace. At times literally pulling myself up by branches, rocks, whatever I could find to aid my quest to reach the top. And you know, as well as I do, that at the top it really is worth it. The view is incredible. The feeling of overcoming something difficult is truly awesome.
Got some left over lettuce from a party in my house and I decided to stir fried it using the recipe that I learned from Chef Michael Smith of Chef at Home show in Asian Food Channel. He used spinach for this recipe but I decided to go ahead with the leftover Crisp-Head Lettuce.
I was pretty determined I was going to get a long bike ride in Saturday morning before the rain started. It ended up being slightly longer than I thought and I rode about 25km. There were struggles toward the end though because I didn't have breakfast (left in a rush and forgot my bar I was going to eat) and because I haven't attached my bag to the bike yet, didn't take any food with me. It was really foolish of me actually because I could feel my body screaming for energy and in the end my legs were wanting to refuse pushing the pedals. Lesson learned.
Holy Spirit,
I like to cook especially while camping or just enjoying the outdoors. shish kabobs is one of of those meals you can use what you like either chicken, beef, pork or all 3 together.
Ali and Ben are kind enough to give Andrew and I a chance to be alone with the baby before they leave and say goodbye. I know we will be seeing this little one again, but it will be nice to have that moment since we will have been on quite a journey together. I am actually hoping for a nighttime delivery so that I can leave the next afternoon. I'm not a fan of trying to sleep in hospitals and since the hospital will want to keep the baby for at least 24 hours if I can leave early Ben and Ali will get to be on their own with their baby there.
But thy changeable afternoon in June shall not fade
Okay so the last post I wished you all a Happy Thanksgiving. The boy and I went to my aunt's parent's house in SLC to spend the day.
1/2 tsp curry powder
1. Criminal cases had to be tried during daylight hours and on the final day must be completed before darkness fell.
What's your biggest fear?
Capitol Hill CoffeeHouse.com
It might just take a little longer to get there, but I will, slowly and surely. Why, before you know it, I'll be strapping my armour back on and I'll be ready to slay that dragon once again! ;)
The only way I know of to stay in alignment is by following what John taught:
We ended up getting several when our kids were little. Because that’s what parents do. That’s what good parents do. Parents aren’t good parents if they don’t buy their child a hamster. So says famed psychologist and pet store owner, Vladimir Nincompoop.
Maddy, after one of her normal monologues about anything and everything all at once, tells Emily "I talk a lot!"
So… not going back there. Will find another way to work out here. My mediocre run total for the day came to approx 5k in 33 minutes. Not a great time on a treadmill.
Yeast nutrient with 10 min left in boil
What I want men to know is that they are loved. By women. Very much so. And I want them to know the effects they have on women.
A year or so later, we were ready to get a dog. Everyone but Jack. He wanted a dog so badly, but upon doing the math, figured he'd be heading off to college when the dog died. He decided that loving and losing a dog would be too painful and traumatic.
That Tropical Malady is defined by these moments is in no way a criticism. Its bare plot, which spins two seemingly separate stories with much room for individual interpretation, feels at times like a blank canvas. We project ourselves onto it by bringing our own interests and emotional perspectives; seeing a creation of love or revulsion, devotion or obsession, depending on our own individual personalities. As a result, the film remains vague, elusive even; challenging the audience to think themselves through the film, to ponder its great mysteries and construct the plot in hindsight from the similarities that are formed by both parts of the narrative.
Solutions improving the energy efficiency of traditional construction materials and reducing their carbon footprint are growing. In waterproofing segment, though traditional methods like removal of brickbat coba has been widespread, newer methods and technologies of getting rid of leakages are reaching the market almost every day. Huge range of waterproofing membranes has been designed to give breakthrough from the nuisance.
as a school of fish decided to swim all around her legs making it impossible
1) I love peas. Well, all vegetables really, but mostly peas.
Back to the internet I went to seek out advice from recently married couples. From what I can glean from these advice forums, people (a) like receiving everyday dishware the best, (b) wish they hadn’t registered for china or crystal since they never use it, and (c) wish they’d registered for a stand mixer. Some also said they wished that they’d registered for some non-traditional things (lamps, garden tools, etc). Is that okay to do or is it weird? Come on. We’ve all been there. You go to Target, print off the registry, and see something on there that totally makes you think “why in the heck would you put that on your registry?!” One time I printed out a registry only to find it filled with requests for DVDs, video games, and clothing. It was strange and not what I wanted to buy them for their wedding.
What are the minimum amount of “upsales” that are required over a month’s period of time??
And perhaps you can spot it here below by night, amid the glow of an amber evening. An evening for heating bath water on the fire, for crocheting next to a candle, and for reading books with a horlicks.
Fuller's Vintage Ale, 2000. John Keeling, the master brewer at Fuller's, pulled this out of his own cellar when we visited--and it was definitely the highlight of the night. Eleven years is pretty long for an 8.5% beer, but Keeling designed this for the long haul. (Amazingly, it's still available for just eight pounds--the best deal in brewing.) There is, predictably, lots of dark fruit and smooth, caramel notes. The immediate impression is port, though. The taste of age, chemical changes and very slight oxidation, is on perfect display here. It is a crucible for cellaring beer: if you don't like this beer, cellaring is not for you. Our crowd greeted it with astonishment and delight.
Last December, apparently in a Christmas rush, we mentioned Tim Kent's Civil War Blog but failed to provide a permanent link. We're correcting that oversight today, as well as suggesting you invest in his novels--a must for any Civil War aficionado.
This is an important insight for us to sit up and take notice of. You see, in the Beatitudes, Christ tells us about the inward and personal character of his followers – the real counter-culture. Then he makes an important shift that I want you to notice. He tells us that it’s impossible to follow the norms of the Kingdom – to be his followers in the world – in a purely private way. Donald Carson writes:
Let's start with crushes. It'll be short, I promise. My friends keep teasing me that I have an obsession with J names. In a way, it's kinda true? I mean, the past 3 crushes I had all had J names. I have no idea why. I almost developed a crush on my friend who has a J name too. Seriously. I have no idea why. Ok this is kinda weird? Hehe let's move on.
1) Some men don't even know that they have a safe option to color
Maybe all it takes to make the rain go away is to complain about it. In any case, that method seems to have worked for me yesterday. May 1st is labor day holiday in France and most of Europe, I think. Almost no one works on May day, which makes it a great day to be a tourist, plan a picnic, and collectively enjoy the day off. Yesterday, I wanted to go meet a fellow blogging friend, Kristin, and taste the wine her husband makes. She doesn't live very from away, about an hour, but we had never met (I might be just a little bit shy about doing these kind of things). A May day wine tasting was a good motivator for a quick road trip.
This second me will get involved
Meanwhile, as Richard Wan continues to be ‘entertained’ by weekly lawyer’s letters from prominent public figures in Singapore, the real owner of ‘TR Emeritus’ is laughing his way to the bank as rising advertising revenue and donations from sympathetic supporters fill his pockets.
Recipe: Purple Oval
Yes, but what about the young people—Britain's true binge-drinkers?
We call the shot.
This is my first post on this blog, so I will tell you about some books that I read before starting this blog. I will only name a few, but some of them I hate to tell you about because they were so awesome!
3 1/2 - 4 cups quick oats (depending on how gooey you like them!)
Normally I'd give the win to whichever pack DIDN'T produce a Bagwell card (since I seem to pull so many Bagwell's). However, the Meadows card is beat up...once again Topps Stadium Club produces a crappy condition'd card. 8-5 Pinnacle!
Female CEOs take on riskier assignments, in order, to advance in their career. For example, consider Campbell’s CEO transition from Douglas Conant to Denise Morrison. Morrison is going to run a company with an uncertain future. Americans have lost their taste for soup, and their rival Progresso has taken a lot of market share. Riskier assignments also mean a higher probability of failure. When a female CEO fails, it’s the news of a century. Recently, Avon announced the replacement of Andrea Jung as CEO. When Mrs. Jung first became CEO in 1999, she was the first woman to lead the consumer products company. She won admiration for her attention to detail, and changed the company culture. The company grew successfully until 2005 when profit margins began to shrink. Avon began faltering international markets, and loosing business in the US. Critics have publically denounced Jung as a failed CEO. But when JCPenney announced its executive replacement, more attention was placed on the incoming CEO, Ron Johnson, than JCPenney’s old CEO. In fact, in most articles, there is mention of JCPenney’s faltering business, but never is the old CEO mentioned as being the cause of it.
So here goes.
Thankfully, I had some ramen noodles, which I cooked and drained, seasoned and served with melted cheese--the breakfast of champions! Mmmmm. If there's one thing I've learned from years of kitchen experiments, it's that you learn from your mistakes and move on to create better things, lest you're doomed to repeat your failures and end up with a horrible taste in your mouth and hunger that won't go away. It's kind of like life. You live. You learn. And if you're lucky, you have more fun and good food along the way.
February on Instagram: Tuxedo nails, home made cookies, friday night drinks, free beer money, Aloe Blacc and JBT, Miso Udon soup, Valentines cupcakes, Monopoly with the kids, heart nails, roses, chocolate roses, new/old shirt, garage sales, Ladi 6, beautiful weather, Ruby in the garden, cider with Adam, water fight, packages, cute pastel nails, berry cider, more packages, ta da!, stationary, stationary drawer, Ruby nails, Apricot tea, Top Girls premiere, Savour and Devour, Surprise 21st, BAAAAA, Vilagrad, cider, floral nails, amazing home made fish and chips, fashion fest tickets, happy 5th birthday Curtis!
If you have any final postings you really think should be included, I am happy to add them. My e-mail address is on the top right of the page. Thank you for visiting, and please comment to let me know what you think of the selection. Thank you!
For two, this cake...
This year, the state is making its requirements very clear. Universities will be getting 3 percent more funding than last year, and if they can keep tuition increases below 4 percent, they can qualify for even more. The awarding of additional funding will depend on four different categories within each university.
There’s a vast tank of this nutritious brain-feed on Twitter, and it’s entirely free. Follow the right people and you have an immediate hotline into as much of their working lives as they choose to reveal. If someone’s doing what you want to do, take note of their attitudes, their approach to things, their thoughts on the industry, their flashes of insight.
The library catalogue table is followed by another listing the numbers of periodicals found in coffee houses, public houses and eating houses in the area. The newspapers most frequently found in coffee houses appear to have been the Sun (43 instances), the Times (40) and the Weekly Dispatch (37). In public houses, however, the Morning Advertiser was the most widely found (248 instances) followed by the Weekly Dispatch (189). It’s an interesting table, but it presents some difficulties. What was the methodology? Were they periodicals supplied by the establishments or brought in by the patrons? How many establishments were visited? Wyatt-Edgell doesn’t comment on the moral nature of the publications. But he does mention that the data on public houses was obtained ‘with great difficulty from the publicans; nor would it probably have been obtained so correctly, but through the perseverance of a very zealous agent’. If I could get a research grant for investigating reading material in London pubs, I’d be very zealous too.
A diva for a boss, a dead guy for a lover, a group of famous ghosts, and a murder on her hands is enough to make anyone crazy, but Evie handles it all with finesse and determination as she juggles the dead and the living in her quest to find a killer and hopefully become a star.
My idea for police training is this: rather than give thousands of officers 4-8hrs training in the hope they’ll learn the contents of this website and then recall it all effortlessly in the 2-5 jobs per year where such detailed knowledge is required. Let’s remember, a lot of ‘mental health jobs’ don’t necessarily involve specialist procedural or legal knowledge at all, such as jobs where criminal arrests need to be made of suspects with mental health problems.
I have sad, but important news to share with you - I'm officially closing up shop with Sarandipity Sweets.
I’d be lying if I said I didn’t love the book. I adored it. There is something in its pages that touches the heart of every woman and I too paid homage to her memoir with a trip to meet Ketut Liyer, the medicine man and palm reader. I was strangely nervous before meeting him, just in case he said something life altering as he did to Liz. Something I wasn’t prepared to hear, but Keutut told me everything that sounded pleasing to my ears. “You a pretty woman. You marry just once and live happily ever after with your three children. You be very rich and have good health. You live till 101, you very very lucky.” After knowing that Gilbert’s predictions turned out to be true, I was elated. After Google told me that he’s been saying the same thing to every other woman who walks into his doors ever since, I was amused. My own impression was that Ketut was a very sweet man; probably having a hard time with all the women, who were now thronging into his home, waiting to be told their great destinies as he did Gilbert’s.
The disappointment is no reflection on the performances – Anne Hathaway as Emma Morley, Jim Sturgess as Dexter Mayhew and Rafe Small as Ian are all excellent. Hathaway’s Yorkshire accent comes and goes but she nevertheless manages to convince as she blossoms from frumpy non achiever to successful novelist; her upward trajectory mirroring the declining fortunes of Dexter.
In fact, they cannot reach
The preliminary blood work showed that no heart attack enzymes had been secreted so that was good. What was not so good is that his blood pressure had gone up alarmingly. The doctor determined that it would be best to admit Alex and do some testing "just to be on the safe side".
C O N F I D E N T I A L SECTION 01 OF 02 PRETORIA 001712
$10.99
I wanted to share these rules because I found them to be so incredibly inspiring. I think every parent should strive to raise their children this way. I hope I can live up to these standards when Butterfly comes.
The by-now completely overwhelmed self-deceived will commonly react to this snowballing state of affairs not by abandoning their initial strategy, but by imposing a greater volume of self - induced stupidity....attempting to cover it all over like a cat shitting in a gravel driveway by using more lies combined with abreactive stress responses. And all the while, their fucked-up paradigm state steadily propagates as they continue to apply it to the people and things around them.
When we pray for Jerusalem something amazing happens, it’s a fullness, a completeness, a peace, a sense of ease. I imagine it’s like the woman touching the hem of Jesus garment, or what is also known as the tallit, but that is a whole different blog for another day.
Let me end where I started, by saying that South Africa boasts some very talented directors, actors and film makers. I hope that at some point someone among them will look at our past, scratch the surface of the propaganda and ask, "What really happened?"
(...And just in case you are wondering, we DO NOT go out at like 5am...
Envy is also alive and well in the hundreds of shops in Las Vegas. If you came to Sin City without a wardrobe to keep up, you can buy one here, at a (very inflated) price. I had a few hours to kill before my hotel room was ready and I thought I’d get a pedicure. At $75, I reconsidered. Coming from NYC where there is so much clothing and style from which to choose, I balked at things marked $150 and up for what I knew would fetch half that or less in NYC. But for those who if they can’t beat em, must join em, the outfit is available in Las Vegas.
Wente, in her article, points to a few stories & statistics to support her argument. Women now outnumber men in many university programs, for example. Oh, and the outrage over Robert Dewar, the Manitoba judge that recently put his foot in his mouth during a rape case - that's another indication that we're all good now.
You may see a gal or a guy passing multi color cards to train passengers. They are not passing you information booklets. It is a note telling you they need money to feed their family and a little donation for their train tickets would be helpful. It is up to you how you wish to react – decline the cards or give them a bit of money. It happens at several train stops so don’t be surprised.
I am not surprised by these survey results because, since 1982, most parents contacting the National Vaccine Information Center tell us they want to trust what their doctors tell them about vaccination. Mothers and fathers depend upon their doctors to give them good advice; but when the health of their child or a child they know deteriorates after vaccination, 2 parents logically start to ask questions. And when they are belittled or even threatened for asking those questions, 3 4 the relationship between doctor and parent is never the same again.
This weeked spring is coming, I can feel it! The weather is pretty cold today, a chilly 16 degrees with the wind, but the sun is shining and tomorrow it is supposed to be 60! Goodbye snow!
It works perfectly fine for me and I give Moffat credit for seeing this idea through, when it would have been easier (or more like him) to come up with some left field swerve. He was trying to bait you to walk down that path with the introduction of Lorna Bucket. Director Peter Hoar’s camera kept finding her before she became important, and she made a gift for Amy and Melody in the form of a prayer hanky (or whatever she called it, which was definitely not “prayer hanky”) that she embroidered Melody’s name on. Lorna is from the Gamma Forest, where she met the Doctor as a child, and then she joined the clerics to meet him again, even if the clerics are fighting the Doctor. Lorna gives Amy this prayer leaf which will eventually reveal River’s identity.
Sometimes said black people get confused and buy after-sun lotion instead of suncream, thinking it’s the same thing.
"Hey mom, what year was it again when I lost my rubber giraffe over at Grand Union"?
Fredric Wertham wasn't finished, though. With the media getting more interested, he takes the ball into his own hands. In the Saturday Review of Literature dated May 29, 1948, Wertham came out with guns blazing with “The Comics …Very Funny!”. Wertham now pushed his condemnation of comic books, specifically crime comic books, even further onto the public’s radar in a major article, a cover story written by Wertham himself.
Baby girl screamed and flung her arms wide; Mason did the breakdance scramble he's perfected. Papa Grey swelled with pride and I recoiled further into the kitchen.
Bartleby took another long breath.
I hate to ask personal questions in this kind of context. I suppose I feel that I should be going after the answers myself. But since I had to ask something when it was time, I came up with a health question. (I’ve always got those.) I said that although I had been getting stronger and stronger with the energetic inputs I’d been getting from Michael and other sources, in the past few weeks I had been sick a lot and still didn’t feel like I was quite right. I asked whether I might have picked up something from a patient or been energetically damaged somehow in the course of my work. The person doing the reading had trouble getting anything, and other people tried to help. Everyone, including a Reconnective Healing practitioner who was in the class, felt that something was actually wrong, but nobody could put their finger on it. Betsy told me that I could ask again later, but I was feeling so completely filled with good Qi by the entities around me that it didn’t seem like an urgent question anymore.
Thanks so much much to everyone who entered our "Someone special" challenge.
Salt – To Taste
Have you seen this yet? I can't stop watching it.
Merrell: My stomach is getting flat. See?
Now, do you know what I meant by the title on this piece, “Fools in high places”? Got it, folks? Four more years of this lunacy? I don’t think so.
The Sydney Morning Herald also reported this in a very similar format to the above article. They used a balance perspective by including quotes from parties on both sides of the conflict and both articles also included a photo of the mentioned minister.
olive oil to taste (about 2-4 tbsp)
I am updating the data warehouse fact tables every hour.
Politically, Bersih 3.0 will reveal whether Malaysia will become more polarised or compromises can be reached. It will either provide momentum for the opposition, or signal an early election by Najib if turnout is low, in which he will win, in part due to the problems engendered in the system.
Publisher: That's a shame.
Eventually though I reach the point where I leave Kings Wood, and the North Downs Way, as I come to the footpath that leads south across Godmersham Park. Where this meets the forest edge, a deerleap can be found – a ditch and wall similar to the ha-ha that surrounds Penshurst Place. It was constructed in the 18th century at a gap in the paling fence that surrounded Godmersham Park to allow deer to enter the park to be hunted but not return to the safety of the forest.
■Use some type of lattice
1. Exercise 60 minutes every day and change it up. Run, hike, cycle, lift weights, jump rope, row, swim, dance. Choose activites you enjoy and enlist your friends.
Here's my next cooking project:
with head held high
Hold on tight to His hand
WE AIM TO HELP THEM LITERALLY
See? It totally works, and who cares if I am more suspicious of my coworkers than I should be. Maybe I SHOULD be suspicious. Better safe than sorry.
GBH -Grievous Bodily Harm. One step down from attempted murder.
4 cloves of garlic, minced
But Todd and I followed anyway, claiming that we needed the exercise, trying to make ourselves believe that's why we were going.
But isn’t it the case that blogs are a kind of public diary of private worlds. Sei Shonagon was considered a shameless hussy for writing out “those Chinese writings of hers that she so presumptuously scatters about the place we find they are full of imperfections. Someone who makes such an effort to be different from others is bound to fall in people’s esteem.” So said her great female contemporary, Murasako Shikibu, author of The Tale of Genji, the world’s first novel.
I want to end on one of the things I really enjoy about these skewers that I feel make them even more special. They’re arranged from small pieces at the bottom to larger pieces at the top. AJ says this is so they cook evenly, since the convection of the heat flows from front to back, making it hotter toward the larger pieces, ensuring the small bites and bigger bites are all cooked perfectly at the same time. I challenge you to try that at home. I will add, that it makes each bite unique as well. Some are small chewy bits, while others are soft meaty bits. It’s a fun mix of textures that pick up more or less sauce, more or less oak, and make each mouthful different than the last.
...what?
Starting off my series of Guest Halloween Chocolate Posts, today I welcome back Guest Blogger Mystery Author Cleo Coyle. If she thinks I'm an inspiration (see note below), she's got it a bit reversed. Cleo Coyle is my inspiration with her wonderful mysteries, fabulous recipes, and terrific photos!
It's not fair to JT that he's away from his daughters and it's not fair to the girls that they can't see Daddy - but we've agreed that we'll do this long distance thing for a year until JT can establish himself at his new job. I left my home, Hawaii six years ago and it totally broke my heart. Then I moved back to the island with JT, Ju Ju and Soapy four years ago and I thought we'd never move again. But we had to move again this time to NJ... Ever since then, I feel like I'm not the same person anymore. Something inside me shifted and I've put a huge guard and try not think too much about Hawaii.
They’re no longer together but he did deliver this time. Now Mi Roo’s spending her birthday alone, eating Jin Oh’s lobster. She hammers the hard lobster shell to get at the meat. Considering the day Mi Roo has had, it seems like it would be therapeutic. She starts sobbing by herself, shoveling in mouthfuls of lobster.
LUV should have been about a particular new kind of car, rather than about a particular car. The moment Suzuki detailed the specifications, LUV became a defined car model. The highlights of LUV should have been “LUV gives you flexi-seating, LUV is powerful. LUV gives great mileage. LUV is accommodating. LUV cools the entire car.”
For about a week now, Shiloh’s tail head had been raised, hip muscles and ligaments obviously softened and depressed (“caved-in” on both sides). Here is her rump shot back in November (remember the infamous pregnancy test?) :
(bridge)
Well, I don't know what Yahoo answered about this, but I'd have to say a big resounding "NO!"
That are piled in my back yard.
Roses are sprayed with Copic's RV04 and BG72
thank you all for your concern and for your visits. it's nice to be loved AND you're all definitely a blessing to me. now go enjoy your day!
25. A picture of your favorite day
The “community immunity” club being used today to take away civil liberties in the name of the greater good, conveniently fails to make a distinction between diseases. Hepatitis B is not polio and chickenpox is not smallpox but vaccine laws requiring mass use of dozens of doses of new vaccines treat all infectious diseases and vaccines the same way.
“Did I just say sumptin funny?”
Sloppy Firsts by Megan McCafferty
So my list of freebie jobs for friends and family builds and builds, until I don’t have time for the jobs that actually pay the bills. I’m not going to tell you to NEVER do some favor jobs for people you care about, but I am going to warn you that if you give an inch, people tend to ask for a mile. So…
Banana Bundt Bread with Cinnamon Streusel Crust
It’s always interesting to hear the wild variety of anecdotes when it comes to the survivors of NDEs. With any consistent evidence for the survival of physical death, I anticipate some very fascinating angles taken in the Atheist vs. Theist debate circuit.
My character then takes his medallion, 'cause it's made of shiny gold, but takes no interest in the hammer. At all. Not even to check if the handle was a fake.
She paused, smiled, shrugged her shoulders and said “OK, when?”
SANTA CRUZ, Calif. — Poet Adrienne Rich, whose socially conscious verse influenced a generation of feminist, gay rights and anti-war activists, has died. She was 82.
Before going up the main thoroughfares we decide to pop into Trinity College, and ask some students what they thought; sure don’t they spend half their lives in pyjamas?
Keeper of the Home has a great post on Developing the Exercise Habit. With the start of the New Year, exercise is definitely something you should consider adding to your daily routine and she gives some great pointers on how to make that happen.
On the day of Clayton’s execution, the narrator uses the telecrtroscope and discovers that the inventor is still alive in another country. Clayton is cleared of the first crime, but since someone’s clearly been murdered, he’s tried for the second. Through some judicial tautology, because he was pardoned for a crime he didn’t commit, his is still guilty of the murder that did happen but wasn’t the correct murder. The narrator calls this “French justice,” of the sort of the Dreyfus affair which declared that all decisions by the court are permanent. Clayton is executed.
High above the crashing emerald waves of the wild, frothing sea, Rianna stood on the grassy bluff. Her thick ebony hair flailed in the wind like whipping banners as her blue-green eyes scanned the waves for a glimpse of her father's huge merchant ship. She saw no tiny scrap of sail on the horizon, no sign of a wooden hull. The wind caught at her full skirt, wrapping like a protective cocoon around her little brother who stood beside her. He shivered, his dark eyes somber, his body small and thin like the reeds that grew by the inland rivers.
1/4 Cup light mayonnaise
And it gets worse because I get impatient with doing just one thing at a time. If I'm watching TV I need to be on my computer at the same time. If I'm brushing my teeth, I'm definitely reading a book. And if I'm in the elevator going down to my car, I'm also playing a game on my iPhone. As I type this I'm realizing how ridiculous this sounds, especially since it's all true. The only time I let myself relax and really take downtime is when I am asleep, after I've read for long enough that my eyes are closed and Richie has to move the book and turn out the light for me.
I think there may be lots of myself hidden in the character of Ella. When I wrote this book I was caring for my father, who was diagnosed and suffering with Lewy Body Dementia, and I was still recovering from the recent death of my mother. Ella’s feelings about her mother’s death reflect a lot of my own grief process.
colors, the background against which it is portrayed, the medium, the size of the objects pictured, their details and, crucially, their entirely different purpose and meaning-as part of a massive painting commissioned for exhibition in a German art-gallery space. We therefore conclude that the use in question was transformative.
This week at the Grade 5 level we looked at the SOSE unit on Australian Symbols.
Nones are a growing percentage of America’s population — people who claim no religion. However, the article said that most Nones consider themselves to be spiritual and open to God, just not religion. The article said that denominations must decide whether to adapt to the Nones or loose them.
You won't be dissapointed....
Boxer's are a high energy breed and Abbey is DEFINITELY no exception! She
Chocolate Glaze
I was in a bit of a pinch because my craft room was being painted last week and today the carpet is being cleaned, and then finally tomorrow I can begin moving things back in and reorganizing. I'm sure some purging will take place as well. ;) But that's for a later post. I only mention it here because aside from the sentiment inside, this card is stamp and digi-free, and the main bits (paper, chipboard letters, wood frame, stickers) came from Studio Calico kits, which I love and adore completely!
Overall, a great healing and soothing product to give a try!
Unfortunately, the Rhino's lost. It's actually the first game that we've seen that they've lost. Most of their games are SO one sided. The Rhino's dominate and destroy everyone we've ever watched them play. Not tonight. CPT said it was a good game. I don't know that much about hockey. It was 1-2 score. I think they've played this team before. And won. And there's another game on Saturday. So whoever wins on Saturday wins, right? Isn't that how it works?
I do have one other kilt item to share tonight. I few months ago Sue-Ellen shared a YouTube video of a song “The Drunk Scotsman”. I found another video that is really funny but now that I am ready to put it in the one picture I don’t want up as the front piece is all I get. So I will put up this recitation that is also good and has more to the story. ff at the end you get a choice to see more videos and there is a picture of a group of lads from a wedding party in front of a church please watch that one as it is the one I intended to put here.
“No. Too little in the way of real tools, peer to peer assistance”
On May 2 when I switched on the radio and heard that Osama bin Laden had been killed I was pleased to hear the news, but I also had misgivings over rejoicing at he death of anyone, even if they were as evil as Osama bin Laden, who was responsible for the deaths of thousands of innocent people. I did not have much time to think about this as I had a busy day ahead of me. The following day we were flying to Amsterdam for a short break. By the evening every thing was done and we were packed and ready for an early-ish start the following day. Then the trepidation set in and I began to wonder if it was such a good idea to be flying the day after the demise of Osama bin Laden. al-Quaeda would no doubt be retaliating, unless they had been weaken to the point where they were unable to do so.
OU Comments: They played May 27-29, 1976 - Broadcast a few weeks later on WNYU
Yesterday I went and had my left shin tattooed. Finally finished with the traditional portraits on the front of my legs... time to move onto another spot! Afterward I came home to do some work and bake some yummy chocolate chip cookie dough pies for Marissa and Kayce, who came over last night with some champagne and St. Germaine (How I've never had St. Germaine I will never know, but it was delicious!) So sweet of them to bring us housewarming cocktails and to sit out on the front porch for a couple of hours chatting. They're new moms (7 months and 5 months respectively) of sweet lil' boys and it felt so surreal to be talking about parent-things! haha They are total gems though. So thankful for them!
Wolfgang Hampel, author of the Betty MacDonald Biography and winner of the first Betty MacDonald Memorial Award founded Betty MacDonald Fan Club and Society in 1983. We are the largest Betty MacDonald Fan Club in the world - with members in 26 countries. Join our wonderful international Betty MacDonald Community!
Getting a story in one of Maxim Jakubowski’s ‘Mammoth Books of Best British Crime’ made me think I hadn’t wasted people’s time.
Specifically, this post contains photos of Amsterdam’s Red Light District and Sex Museum, including depictions of sex acts, disembodied body parts, a rusty chastity belt that will make you want to close your legs forever, and lots and lots of nudity. None of it is of real people (though there are photos of photos of people) and it’s all pretty tame, tbh. Links are also possibly NSFW – but you can use your own discretion here. We cool? Okay.
Use every statistic that you can get to know all about the hard facts, but be ready before guests have wishes, requirements and demands. And be even more ready if you failed for any reason and let your guest feel that you are personally honoured that they are here. If you respect that you change the statistics yourself because than guests will more often come back exactly to your place because they felt understood – they felt like home.
as this torment takes its place.
Fan……tastic
Main St, Ft. Worth, Texas
But really, no one wants to dance near Grampa on the dance floor. Grampa is made fun of. I know it. I’ve cracked the jokes. So in a few years (the time comes quicker for us gays) I may soon be left with little choice but to rely on the venerable old Centretown Pub – an Ottawa institution that caters pretty much to older and larger men (and their admirers) – for my dance fix. Either that or venture further afield to the broader choices present in Montreal. Hmmm, that second option doesn’t sound so bad.
Today’s outfit is inspired by all the fearless, brights-mixing girls in Wardrobe Remix (link in right sidebar). I initially planned to pair the brights with black, but a spread in Glamour (or was it Marie Claire?) magazine coupled brights with gray and I liked the effect. It is, somehow, even more dramatic than black.
In Portugal, where the government forecasts the unemployment rate will average 13.4 percent this year, up from 12.7 percent in 2011, Soares da Costa SGPS SA, Portugal’s third- biggest publicly traded construction company, said it’s expanding abroad and eliminating jobs at home, where it faces a slump in government infrastructure spending.
For me, there is only the travelling on paths that have heart, on any path that may have heart... ( Yaqui Medicine Man Don Juan)
Day 6: (Platelets 76,000)
By now, Henry is probably hungry and cold again, just as he was when I met him. But for one hour that day, Henry's life was a little bit brighter. For one hour, Henry got to sit in a warm diner, and eat a hot meal, and talk to someone who was willing to listen to his story. For one hour, Henry got to feel like somebody cared.
He stood above her as she rocked, his face puffy and red, every muscle in his body taut. She reached out to him and took his hands and slowly had him kneel on the floor in front of her. He went to the ground without knowing he was doing it. She turned his head and laid it on her lap. She ran her hands through his hair.
This is what I'm asking you to put in your face today.
May I not miss beauty of nature or the flesh of a woman
More than ever was known to you
no, you didn’t have to stoop so low/ have your friends collect your records/ and then change your number / guess i don’t need that though/ now that you are somebody that i used to know
Inspiration: Although bittersweet and semisweet chocolates are the most commonly used for Chocolate Chip Cookies, you don’t have to limit yourself. Milk or white chocolate, butterscotch chips, blueberry, orange, sesame or chili-infused good quality 70% cacao chocolate are each fabulous and add an extra special flavor twist to your cookies. And exchange the traditional pecans or walnuts for macadamia or Brazil nuts, hazelnuts, pine nuts or pistachios or even peanuts, either salted or unsalted depending on your taste. Or replace either the chocolate or the nuts with dried cranberries, blueberries, cherries or other dried fruit.
They have a LATCH-like system called ISOFIX in newer cars but not all car seats use it. Some of them have supports I have never seen on a US car seat, like a big stick that anchors on the floor mat and foot props. They’re really quite elaborate, to be honest.
skin
A blanket of terror obliterates the sea. The sand. His words, the bruises on my arms and pain in my chest and legs.
Macadamia nuts–(even a few) induce vomiting, weakness, diarrhea, and rear leg paralysis
Oh, yeah. Spring is here.
The Misereatur and Indulgentiam can be also traced to the Sacrament of Penance. Until 1970 when the rite was revised, they were prescribed in the Sacrament of Penance to be said by the priest before sacramental absolution was given. They could however, be omitted for a just cause.
Have you ever wished you could make yourself look less tired in a photo, or wanted to remove a blemish that popped up the morning it was taken? Did the lighting make your under-eye circles look even worse than they really are? Well, you can easily fix all of that in digital photos, and I show you how in less than 10 minutes!
Like Fryer, he called the Pacific Northwest trench a “mirror image” of the Japanese trench — except potentially even more dangerous.
Son: what does revolve mean?
I bounced around a bit in this post, but I think the main message is clear – RIM needs to find a way to change how the company is perceived in the media. The media can make or break a company, it can make your new features seem revolutionary, or it can knock them down and say they’re too little too late. I think RIM’s message needs to be clear going forward with BB10 – - it’s a completely new experience. There’s iOS, there’s Android, there’s BlackBerry, and there’s BlackBerry10 – - a completely new experience with security, strong messaging, and cross platform compatibility at its core.
Look at these funky little salt and pepper shakers. There is no denying that the W, and indeed Rice, is full of cute looking things (including the wait staff). But I can't help but get the feeling that the emphasis at Rice is more on style than on substance. The quality of the food didn't really live up to the surrounds in which it was served. You can have the cutest shakers in the world but if they haven't got any salt and pepper in them, I don't quite see the point.
He pretends to talk on the phone.
Successful economies make useful things. Simple, eh?
Absolutely. It was one of those moments in time and place when nature allowed us a more personal role in one of its scenes. Balboa Park, in San Diego, has a sunken garden, a place that's desiged to attract butterflies. Ashley and I had walked into a brief period (at sunset) when there were dozens of butterflies alighting on blooming flowers. Birdsong came from the trees. The light was golden and dappled. We stood still and a butterfly alighted on the back of my daughter's hand. It was then that I got the idea for The Butterfly Forest.
A Red-tailed Hawk pair has been nesting on a light pole nearly 80 feet above Cornell University’s athletic fields on Tower Road for at least the past four years. In 2012, we installed a camera to get a better look at these majestic birds as they raise their young amid the bustle of a busy campus (see the behind-the-scenes video). So far, we’ve seen the birds bringing prey such as voles, squirrels, and pigeons to the nest.
1 anywhere
PLDT: 044-8931863 / Globe: 0927-2172466 / Sun: 0923-3202126
"Sometimes your nearness requires my breathing away; and all the elements I want to say can discover no speech. Then, alone, I can only wish my sight will talk my center." - John Sexton
Field Day July 26: This is free for all attendees of either the beginners intensive or the main conference (including 3 meals). There will also be a day rate for others who wish to attend the field day only (TBA).
Please excuse my absence. I just spent five (kid free!!) days in Albuquerque for my sister's baby shower. It's her first and I'm so excited to become an auntie for the first time!
It was in dark blackness. It was cold and wet. It shivered. It was just plain no fun.
The German author criticizes a “hypocrisy on behalf of the government” in Germany at the Leipzig Book Fair. He advises “bombing Auschwitz out of existence, because the former concentration camp has degenerated into the “worthless” destination of excursions.
Getting married was difficult for me. I had been engaged twice before with two different men. Both of whom I left when I started to freak out over the whole idea of "forever." So when Mr. Stranger Upstairs proposed, he set it up so we'd marry in five weeks so I couldn't freak out and change my mind. Of course, I did freak out and I changed my mind several times and on our wedding day, when we exchanged our vows, I never promised myself to him forever. We wrote our own vows. I promised to love him always but that I couldn't promise that we wouldn't grow apart or away. I couldn't promise more than I felt certain I could deliver on. At that point, I knew only two couples who stayed married until death did them part and I'd learned that they'd both failed to keep all the promises they made when they said "I do."
POD (print on demand) is not comparable with the costs of offset printing, though the emergence and availability of short digital printing has made it cheaper if an author is prepared to print a few hundred books at a time (200 – 750). Beyond this tipping point, offset printing remains the competitive choice for publishers AND savvy self-published authors. POD is a method of print to order for very low unit amounts. Savvy authors who have slipped into the trap of believing they can promote and market a book that is ‘available to 25,000 retailers’ but doesn’t physically exit as a book until it is ordered, have learned the hard and expensive way that you need stocks of books and a distribution channel that can put books on bookshelves – not virtual shelves. This is the other above misnomer – the vast majority of books sold in the world occur when a customer goes into a store and buys a book from the shelf. The vast majority of books sold by online retailers, including Amazon, are offset printed books that are physically warehoused. That is the reality of publishing as it is now. Will it change? Yes, of course it will. But this is a gradual development and not the ‘revolution’ being suggested by Ogorek.
I decided that the universe must really want me to come up with a better, fuller answer.
Blood to earth, thirsty earth,
(Reporting by Noel Randewich; Editing by Paul Simao)
1 indv. serving of plain greek yogurt
No question is raised as to the constitutionality of Commonwealth Act No. 671 under which Executive Orders Nos. 62, 192, 225 and 226 were promulgated by the President of the Philippines according to the contention of the respondents. The question involved is the validity (not constitutionality) of said executive orders, that is, whether or not the President had authority to promulgate them under Commonwealth Act No. 671; and therefore the concurrence of two-thirds of all the members of this Court required by section 10, Article VIII of the Constitution to declare a treaty or law unconstitutional is not required for adjudging the executive orders in question invalid or not authorized by Commonwealth Act No. 671, which read as follows:
On a side note...On Friday we began another noon Bible study. There were nine of us around the table...all from different walks of life, studying God's Word. We started in chapter 1 of James...and only got as far as the first eight verses! There is so much in those first eight verses that discussing it took the whole hour. It was an uplifting and encouraging time. The group was serving Jesus, as each of us were helping each other learn and apply God's Word to our lives. It was one of the highlights of my week!
I didn't bother to paint the inside of the dresser/cabinet, and I'm glad. I like the 2-tone quality of it and it doesn't feel unfinished to me at all.
I do. 1996, Will Smith in Independence Day. Cinema has a lot of ‘ethnic’ (hate the word but it sounds better than ‘non-white’) heroes. Will is regularly doing the good guy gigs, we’ve Wesley on vamp-slaying duties and Jackie Chan and so on. Have you seen any of their movies? I have. And that’s without being Chinese, of African descent or anything like that.
okay i think you boleh hear it from herself about this project. here you go~
CABARET
Holy Blog Neglect!! Somebody alert the authorities! Life has been busy and wonderful, and I thought once my semester ended I would have all of this time on my hands. Someday I'll learn it doesn't really work that way. Now that I've told you how busy I am, I'm going to tell you about my new favorite time waster, Pinterest. Have you seen it? At first I didn't really get it, and it took me some time to realize how wonderful it is. A collection of people's favorite things that, for me, turns into a swirling collage of beautiful imagery. I love it a lot. You can pin your faves and sort things into categories and even follow your friends. Purely awesome!
NEXT SUNDAY, May 6 – 10:30 am Worship Service with celebration of the Lord’s Supper and receiving of the Deacon’s Offering. Scripture – 1 John 4:7-21
by Marilyn Janovitz (Author, Illustrator)
I have a couple fun cards to show you today....
What she writes is true, from whatever side (student or professor/lecturer/et al.). I’d teach this craziness, even though I had my own doubts about it, and smile at students who challenged me. Happily. I wanted the rigor of independent thinking, the challenging of pat (too pat) ideas and ideology. I wanted my students to think for themselves. (My university, however, was not happy about this. But that’s a blog post for another day.)
2 cloves garlic, finely minced
Celebrate! Celebrate the achievement of getting a goal accomplished. Go out to dinner with someone special, especially if they offered you support along the way. Share your accomplishments, life is best celebrated with people you love, or could love for that matter. Tap yourself on the shoulder, boast a little, contrary to popular belief and practise it is ok to walk with a puffy chest when you achieve something and your proud. We are what we do! Lastly, get to work on the next goal if you haven’t already built the momentum and started.
There is something about such men that really does attract women, and it is too easy to woo them. The pleasure is in the stalking and when the woman is finally conquered, the appeal simply disappears and they are off to find the next conquest. With familiarity, the woman starts to see the flaws in his character and no longer strokes his ego in the same way as at first, and as he seems to need. Sometimes it is that they appeal to the mother instinct, or to the need to nurture or control, or the feeling that they can rehabilitate them. Often the woman does not see the pattern and would be surprised if it were pointed out. Sometimes the woman also feels she does not deserve better and is grateful for the male attention. People are so complex that we will never understand it all.
Life Path 3’s generally live to the fullest, often without much worry about tomorrow. This can result in poor money management; you’re simply not concerned. You spend it when you have it, and sometimes even when you don’t.
ICI reports fixed income mutual funds receiving inflows of $5.1 billion for the week ended June 15th. Fixed income is on such a tear that the cumulative total since 2007 has now reached a new high ($813 billion). Meanwhile, the cumulative total for domestic equity mutual funds has sunk close to its previous low (-$331 billion).
You have almost single-handedly, for the first time since Elaine DeFreitas in the early 90s, managed to give people with this severely disabling infectious disease a lot of hope that finally someone is trying to find the virus/viruses that are causing these diseases, and trying to get us proper treatment that has been missing for decades thanks to the concerted efforts of the CDC and the CBT psychiatrists.
EV8 - Tom Paxton - Be A Sport Afghanistan / Outlaw (June 1980)
I’m Lewis Schaffer. What’s your excuse? ewenmacintosh
Thats it from me for today folks have a great weekend and thanks for dropping by my little place here in cyberspace, happy crafting everyone :-) xxxxx
The Plot Thickens: 8 Ways to Bring Fiction to Life by Noah Lukeman
But Stoke are now coming to the end of their fourth season in the league, and they are still rock bottom when it comes to passes completed. At 6475 they’re a more than 1,500 behind the next club, Blackburn. At this stage Tony Pulis probably doesn’t feel like changing a system that clearly works – rather he’ll be on the hunt this summer for players who can do more of the same, but are even taller, even stronger and even harder-working.
Go to places like Kingston, Istanbul, Paris. Moscow or Saigon.
As I say in my book — my message to them, to all the muslims all over the world, is clear: “Fatalism is no option, Inch’Allah is a curse; Submission is a disgrace. Free yourselves. It is up to you.”
About 300 participants – comprising professionals from voluntary welfare organisations (VWOs), Malay Muslim organisations and other agencies who work with Malay youths and their families – are taking part in the seminar.
In a medium bowl, whisk together: 0.5 cup whole-grain flour, 2 cups milk, 2 Tbsp honey mustard
In the weeks leading up to Silverstone hosting both the F1 grand prix and the Formula Student final, I got the chance to get a sample of both these worlds. Although I didn’t get behind the wheel of a real F1 car, I got the closest you can get outside of an F1 Factory at the University of Hertfordshire’s Cruden Simulator.
MARISOL: This is different. He was the love of my life.
I wanted to be better. More.
Some people don’t say yes to their miracle because they don’t feel worthy of a miracle.
"We believe in open societies ordered by moral conviction. We believe in private markets humanized by compassionate government. We believe in economies that reward effort, communities that protect the weak and the duty of nations to respect the dignity and the rights of all.... We value our own civil rights, so we stand for the human rights of others. We affirm the God-given dignity of every person"
Have you ever heard of a jackalope? It's a mythical creature from the midwest but we found this little guy in a shop in Ballard. When I saw him, I knew I needed him to live in our home. On to the outfit, this was on the first day of October so I dressed in appropriate fall colors.
Ahhhhh Delirium! That was another great book. Gotta love dystopian novels! I love the characters, especially Alex! I need more of him. Yet again, the ending of this one was also a stunner. I have to know how this series will continue.
4) Write 7,500 words of new fiction. - After the success of April, I thought about increasing this number but since I know the end of the month is likely to be very hectic for me in general, I decided to keep it where it is. I'll hope to surpass this target, all the same.
in another mixing bowl, beat the egg whites until stiff. fold into the lemon mixture carefully. now put this in the fridge.
Walking down the memory lane back into the 1912 wasn’t easy given limited resources about one of the deadliest tragedy in the world. None of us were excited to resurrect the memories of a dead ship. Every one of us had clashing opinions about the crash, which were the wonders of our brain. It was like digging a grave of skeletons for autopsy hoping to find a lead on a murder happened a decade ago. It seems impossible for us to craft a dying tale of a man who was dead before he got to the end of his story.
This is what he tells himself every single day. To be realistic because being deluded by all that’s going on, regardless of how amazing it is, can get you into trouble.
The rest view his decision as a kind of novelty. It’s a shame because a city’s bike safety relies on a cyclical tenet — the more cyclists there are on the roads, the more accustomed people become to sharing the road, and the safer the roads are for cycling, the more people start.
Nothing too challenging, experimental or different, but sometimes it’s nice just to trot out the old favourites and not have to think too hard.
Go with yourself.
The secret lies in getting the at-one-ment, getting the consciousness of it and then holding firmly and never deviating, though all earth should oppose. ‘Of myself I can do nothing’, said Jesus. ‘The father that dwells in me, He does the work’. Have faith in God. Have faith and doubt not. Have faith and fear not. Now remember there is no limitation to God’s power. ‘All things are possible.’
Read the comments here for Blog Giveaways sponsored by our Melange team members. Members who have giveaways on their blogs will post them here with a description of the giveaway, an end date, and an appropriate hot link to their blog. Please do not leave any other kinds of comments here, just Melange team giveaway promotions. Anyone can enter and participate!
To rest and think.
Scott Wichman ... Larry
Responsible Pet Owners Alliance (501 C3 Nonprofit)
Task one was to clean up our piles.
Last year I read Plato’s The Republic, and the professor this year has us looking at the “Allegory of the Cave.” In it there are a bunch of prisoners who are chained and all they can see are the shadows in front of them on the wall. They don’t know they are prisoners, and they know nothing about the sun or what is outside of the cave. They are challenged to break free from those mundane surrounds. I thought about what I would do in that situation. Do I break free from what I know and go out and up towards the light? Honestly, I think I would persuade someone to try it out and come back and tell me. LOL I wouldn’t do something like that alone. I honestly don’t know what I would do, I have a history of jumping in head first. My impulses have gotten me in trouble in the past, hence the reason why I would send someone else out exploring. Okay, I’m getting off topic. Back to the story. The prisoners did not want to believe that they were prisoners. They were fine with their shadows.
I’ve added quotes and a poem to accompany the photos.
(If you’re interested in the whole thing from Homophobic Pete’s perspective, the story on his website is here. WARNING: Abandon your lunch all ye who enter there.)
If I were to process again I may patch in the gaps in the trail between the exposures and as a personal preference I would also try to lose the star trails by blending in another image and selectively deleting the trails.
Caravans are moving across a horizon of sands
8: Balance- Light a black and white candle. “God and Goddess / Send me the gift of balance. / Help me to make good choices / And to see clearly / As I balance work and play / Home, health, love, and family. / Keep me focused and firm / As I walk the difficult path / That is the well-lived life / And lend me your strength and wisdom / So I might have balance. / In all these things / So Mote it Be.”
The Beeb really should put this into perpespective rather than be forced into censorship. There are some 60 million people in the UK and 5.68 million who watch Silent Witness.
So tired. Just want to settle on the bottom…no more swimming, no more breathing. I want to be one of those little black birds that sit on the hydro wires, staring out at all that open space before them. Watching the fields and roads, nothing to do aside from hunt down some breakfast.
At first homeschooling or in our case, unschooling wasn't on our radar (even though I grew up with a very close friend that was homeschooled). We actually bought a home near an elementary school in the school district that I grew up in. I wanted close proximity so I could be involved, very involved. That was almost eleven years ago. A few years later we had Marco and we were still on with our plan to send him to the elementary school behind our home. A year and a half later, Lili was born and I stayed home with them full time from day one. We practiced Attachment Parenting (See Dr. Sear's link on my side bar) and it worked very well for us. We were very happy. We went to a few groups while our kiddos were very young, La Leche League and a few home play groups. I met a neighbor at the La Leche League group and we became close. We talked often about how life would be so different from our Attachment Parenting lifestyle we have grown accustomed to when our kiddos go to school all day and come home with things we must do with them that the school sends home for the kiddos to do well in school. Instead of being able to spend some time enjoying an re-connecting with our kiddos when they got back home after being away all day. That of course re-opened my memories of HATING homework and what a waste of my time I truly felt it was, especially when it was in subjects I felt were not of terrible importance to me and my future I had foreseen for myself. Actually, I still not sure I use algebra...ever, but maybe I do, if I do, I do not know that I am because I was never taught what algebra looks like in context, only out of context. *Note to self - Find out out algebra looks like in context asap!* I do however use my consumer's math everyday that I went over in
It wasn't the only Mikkeller on as I had stumbled in to what can only be described as Mikkeller madness. Over a dozen of the Danish beers were on and picking the first beer among the throng to quench my thirst was a very difficult decision.
You seek Recyclement here. Regeneration.
The story begins here...
The photos were taken with my little Canon Powershot, using the farthest zoom setting. While the photos are not the greatest, they still allow me to preserve my memories of my little feathered friends.
“We’re sorry but your menu selection is not available,” the fake woman said patiently. “For more information, you can visit our website at HSAmember.com.”
Basically, bubbles means my area is filled with magickal gunk laying around and I need to cleanse. I assume this was because of the workings I just did and it left all sorts of wonky energies around coupled with the fact that I’ve barely been keeping with my actual practices. Also, I can safely assume that gunk accumulates faster with my practice since I barely banish. (I open a circle, I close a circle, I give spirits a license to depart but I don’t consider those banishing so……)
This is a time of life that you as a Christian should get deeper into God’s word like never before. I will be taking you through a teaching on authority as the Lord Leads me.
Sometimes I feel like Luke Skywalker. My father is Darth Vader and due to some strange negotiations in a foreign empire, a Jedi warrior taught me to wield the Force. Yet I cannot forget my beginnings, and I wish that I could teach my parents a few things about redemption and healing.
4) Sign-up for the air miles opinion surveys. I get a few surveys every week. They only take a few minutes and they provide me with a few bonus air miles every week. https://www.airmilesopinions.ca/index.php?id=19
On the back, these stamps carried by a cute happy butterfly-postie made possible this card to arrive in here. Church and Cathedral from Sieradz and Gniezno respectively. Two churches, one cathedral. Both with green roof. Joy!
Thought I would post up a few of my fave cards from the last 12 months:-
Somewhere inside, you have been growing yourself, to be ready for this stage. Perhaps we fight it, perhaps we've been crying for it, but it comes anyways.
The new living room furniture arrived--good news--and requires assembly. However, the couch box wouldn't fit through the front door and the couch is in pieces in the garage. In the meantime, my mother-in-law Hope arrives next week and David is going on a business trip. See the problem?
Mann contends that both the Eurocentric, racist view of little brown savages in need of civilizing and the more contemporary portrayal, popular with environmentalists, that before contact with Europeans the American natives were simple and pure, living in harmony with a primeval nature which they barely impacted, are wrong. Not only wrong, they are patronizing, even infantilizing.
of candidates, it is impossible for me to accept all refusals.
After the new wears
you very far anymore as your privileges are waning.
12 Edgar Allan Poe
In an interview with the National Geographic magazine in 2009, former Minister Mentor Lee Kuan Yew said it is a ‘good thing’ that Singapore is welcoming so many Chinese immigrants from China as they are ‘harder-driving’ and ‘harder-striving’ than Singaporeans.
MFG Part # : 172J2C
-stomps in the corner by Punk, taking Jericho outside.
Girls on Film
Her sudden sob startled Mackinson and he turned, involuntarily jerking his camera upward so the first photo merely showed the man's feet and the garage wall. He nodded at her and turned back to the task in hand, framing and focusing.
* Celltech R&D v OHIM (Case T-260/03, is the CELLTECH word mark non-distinctive or descriptive?),
Mortgage Approvals (March) 49.860K vs. estimated 48.000K vs. previous 49.029K.
~ Further, I want to try to stick to doing less and concentrating more. I certainly don’t mean LESS fitness, but I do mean fewer trials at the same time.
Cuz Herman Cain he was not all that swell
I wished you were here for this moment … and then I realized you were, but I still miss you so.
The worst part is that I don’t know why.
And oh I'm praying don't be misleading,
At the level of our spiritual life, indeed reality and life is in essence, by definition, spiritual beyond profound, and according to those who have experienced the mystic state of awareness, this state is the only important desire in life, and critical to live if we truly care about our personal spiritual wellbeing and journey through and after life. All the so called ‘real world’ created by human culture and intellectual and physical infrastructure is, is a powerful and dangerous illusion that sustains our physical existence and keeps us trapped in cyclic behaviours that lead nowhere. At best it can afford us the freedom to truly experience life, at worst it can confuse us into believing that what it offers us, is life.
They never meant to imply that other forms of advertising were obsolete or outdated. Or dead, or dying, or had outlived their usefulness.
“I was warned before I went out there that it could be dangerous. But nothing was going to stop me from going. And I’m just so glad I did.”
(Sept 08)
If my great grandfather were alive today, he would probably emotionlessly take this type of girl into the back room, look her in the eye, and smack the shit out of her until she apologized and promised never to do it again.
Virgil, the weekly organizer of these events, was happy to break down this technical process in real terms, “The yeast eats the sugar, burps carbon dioxide and pisses alcohol. In a good beer like this one, the yeast keeps on pissing.” I'm not really the organizer, I'm just the guy who runs the facebook page, and puts out the even invite. And yes, that's actually mostly a quote from Andy Borbely of Seven Saints, the "yeast keeps on pissing", that's all me.
No, to the contrary.
I still haven't decided whether I want to take this site offline, or leave it up until it has obviously run its course. I would prefer to "go out on top" though, rather than let the site continue to die a slow and miserable death. If anyone would like for me to send them the source code for the blogroll, or create a text file with all the links to the blogs listed here, I would be happy to do so. For those interested, I will still be maintaining the aggregated RSS feed for all the sites that are listed here for my own personal reasons on my Google Reader account. You can find the address to it here: http://www.google.com/reader/shared/user/02628427451354667243/label/Shared%20Items
After some moments of fiddling around inside ink black cupboard trying to locate the one switch out of about 120, to get the electricity on again, and having GOT the electriciy on, and having seen that not ALL the work had been deleted in the process, Middle Son said to Husband,
So, there you have it. Humans are creatures who routinely affect the surface of the Earth and the biosphere on a massive scale, so why not this modification which seems so small and so humane? I take my response from Dr. Phil of television fame: "So, how's that workin' out for you?"
Little-known fact: the most important and satisfying rewards one gets from being good at something are not external rewards. They don't always include money or fame or gold stars. For example: nobody ever got a trophy for being in a happy marriage. At best, your spouse will buy you flowers, or do the dishes, occasionally. Does that mean it's not worth the effort?
As Stephen Meyer has argued in his Signature in the Cell, intelligent design argues in just the same way, claiming not merely that the material categories of chance and necessity (singly or in combination) are unable to explain the complex specified information in DNA, but also that in our experience, intelligent agents are the only known causes of such information. The argument is based on what we know about causal powers, not on what we do not know about them.
Fine clear day.
You’re an adult, do what you like, but heh be careful out there and don’t get into a car with strangers because you want to stroke a puppy. Especially not if the driver looks like a body building Freddie Mercury.
from faux saboteurs.
As another example of the “camel’s nose in the tent”, I give you the steps that lead to the Department of Education, with all the things I named above, inflicted on our nation’s school children.”
Glasses per case: 12
Whilst on the subject of empire and colonialism, I have a quick question for the liberal/left: Why is it considered racist to colonise other people’s countries, but also racist to resist the colonisation of one’s own country? If this question can be answered without mentioning self-hatred, anti-white/English hatred or treason, I would love to hear your polite and well argued thoughts…
Finely grate enough peel from 2 limes to measure 1 1/2 teaspoons. Squeeze enough juice from 2 limes to measure 2 tablespoons. Cut third lime into wedges.
You have sinned
A fight against the occupation?
Simone xx
1/4 tsp kosher salt
I was enrolled in Miriam, and I realized that it was so different from JASMS. In JASMS there was barely any homework. It was like once a year. In Miriam there was so much homework that I was stressed. The year ended and my mom told me that I was an honor student. I was stunned. I never knew I was smart. In JASMS, you’ll only know if you’re an honor student if you’re in grade 7, so until that time there was no way that I’d know that I was smart. My mom never informed me that I was smart, and I guess she didn’t know it either.
(probably spoils White Cat)
4/24/12 Update: The past three weeks have apparently seen a lot of activity at WACAP, with several key staff members rumored to have left the agency. Additionally, families have come forward reporting similar experiences with other orphanages, including one assistant orphanage director of a large Jiangxi orphanage who allegedly laundered his own daughter for international adoption. The U.S. State Department is rumored to be looking into the allegations presented in this article, although I have no first-hand conformation of that.
Earlier Sunday, soldiers broke up a demonstration by some 30 people in front of the national assembly, where the talks were being held.
The other zippered compartment, which Lowepro has designed for cables, mic equipment and headphones (this is a video pack by nature) was actually a great place for storing my camera wires, external hard drive and computer charger. I also had enough room left over to squeeze in a notebook and my carry-on liquids. Anyone who knows me knows that I do not check luggage. I’ll wear the same shirt three times if it avoids me having to do this, so the extra room in the pack for these items was a great surprise.
Then the insults and accusation started to be tossed back and forth between the respective Mayors finally the French central government, regional prefect had to step in and ordered Clincy to re-establish two-way traffic on its section of the road.
Second, we use these passages to justify our existing programs and create new ones. For example, ever heard a pastor say, “When we look at the new church what did they do? They devoted themselves to teaching and they worshiped. That is what we do here on Sunday morning. It is important you are here EVERY Sunday. Also, they met in homes. That is why we have started these fancy-nancy, shinny and bright, sparkly and new, solve-all-your-problems, heal-your-marriage, grow-hair-on-your-chest, radically awesome-cool small groups! You can sign up today in the back of the church.”
When I say tiny mountain town, I mean really tiny. We have often had people ask us what the draw is, what there is to do there. The answer is, not much. There's not much at all to do there, and I think that's exactly what the draw is. We are forced to slow down. We have no signal on our phones, and until this trip, the house didn't have WiFi (we were glad and disappointed all at the same time). Our time there is always spent outdoors...hiking, biking, playing in the creek, swinging on the front porch, walks in the evening, eating ice cream at the picnic tables of our favorite diner in town.
In this final post of the placements series, we’re going to put forward some ideas about how you can stay involved with university whilst you’re away on placement and ways that you can make the most of your experience. If you have any more questions about placements that we’ve not answered in this series, leave us a comment, send us a tweet (@productdes) or get in touch with Liz Vassilakes at sciengplacements@brighton.ac.uk. Fellow students are also encouraged to ask the final years in the studio.
NOT WHAT YOU WANTED LIFE TO BE…..
The nose gave off delicate walnut and coffee with sultanas and dried apricot notes.
1/2 cup buttermilk (or 1/2 cup milk + 1-1/2 tsp. cider vinegar)
1) HAVE FUN!!!
~Colm
The little American Kestrel was called Fidget and was the smallest bird in the group. We held out our suitably gauntleted hands with delicacies such as chicks’ legs and chunks of meat and the birds swooped in to grab it up, posed for photographs for a minute then flew back to their handler.
PKStamp- Sun face (I got a set of Peachy Keen stamps for Christmas Yay!!)
*apparently from Bon Appetit but it was in our CSA newletter - how did they KNOW I would have a glut of acorn squash and apples??
From their website: Please join us at the property on Saturday, November 14th at 1pm for a special unveiling event to preview the future home of the world’s first co-operatively owned brewpub. The event will feature brief presentations from the Workers’ Assembly and Board of Directors, a viewing of the space, discussion of conceptual designs, and will be followed by a brief Beer Social. If you’re not yet a member-owner of the Co-op, please join online today!
tells us it was “a strong beer of pale yellow colour, brewed in England (at Burton), which is more important to the Englishman than anything else. It is imitated very well in Germany too (Hamburg, Altona, Lüneburg etc.), but incorrectly called English oil.”
Always changing is key in this Savage World; that you are no longer just living in, but beginning to own!
Or let’s put it this way: I believe in the Law of Gravity. Therefore, I do not jump off tall buildings nor do I throw large rocks into the air and stand on the spot where I expect them to fall. My belief in the Law of Gravity means that I engage in certain behaviors in specific situations. But my belief in the Law of Gravity has nothing whatsoever to do with my decision about where to live or whether to spend my money in a certain way. I believe in the law of gravity. I believe it’s true and it exists. (First type of knowledge.) But I don’t base my life upon my belief in the Law of Gravity. It isn’t the foundational truth that has shaped my deepest beliefs, tendencies and habits.
Some days ya really just have to ask, "If you don't know what you're talking about can you please just STFU?"
18:00 : 19:00 Networking & Drinks
For us the entertainment started when the crowds (many of them in their pyjamas) arrived with their peculiar looking rugs, pillows, blankets and extra large soft toys... stylish cushions and rugs were quite a rare sight indeed. What followed was a mass picnic with all these strangers while waiting for the film to be screened at sundown.
- Parking is EXTREMELY SCARCE, so PLEASE CARPOOL!
sunny gets up and it flies off
STATEMENTS:
It is sent. That is a relief. I do have this little piece to write for Monday, but it's not a proper review, just minor thoughts in the form of an essay, so I think it should be easier and more enjoyable than usual to write (hope those are not famous last words). I am weary!
Pretty outrageous, don’t you think? In the open Israel together with its supportive Jewish lobbies (AIPAC, AJC) are pushing for a new global conflict. Yet, shamelessly the embassy defies criticism tossing in the air the old blood libel. The appropriate timely question here is why Israel and AIPAC are pushing for a world war and a potential nuclear conflict just before Passover? Can they just wait for another Yom Kippur (atonement day)?
Sure Thing: Woody Allen (Screenplay); Best Bet: Picture; Possible: Director (Woody Allen), Editing, Art Direction; Long Shot: Corey Stoll (Supporting Actor)
L:…………
Anyway, the next day after I'd started reading Eragon I got online and checked my email and, low and behold, there was an email announcing the release of the fourth novel (pictured above) titled 'Inheritance'. It will be released November 8, 2011! I'm excited to read it already! It should be an awesome conclusion!
Came back home and put his button on my side table,
Interject and then deliberately suffocate.
Christmas for us, isn't as exciting as it once was.
his troops.
Of the Cleveland Cavaliers
There's too much pain in regret
It was Mercer, her father’s lyricist and close friend, who inspired the young Whiting to take years of vocal training when he told her following an early audition, “G row up and learn to sing.”
Poxy – need context, but generally bad.
When King William (played by Jim Broadbent) does pass, Victoria now 18, became the Queen. Said another way, she got to wear the ermine and velvet robes, as well as the crown. She got to carry the Royal Scepter, and – she got to sit in King Edward’s chair whenever it pleased her.
We hope you enjoy this ongoing musical story of love, life, relationship and change.
Please,I don't need a standing ovation people. It was an easy decision.
To-morrow 'ill be the happiest time of all the glad New-year;
All to blame.
This is happening way too frequently lately, and I’m starting to wonder if this is not a strategy, employed by some people, to wear me down -- as some of my replies take considerable time and effort to compile.
be full...ahhh, that's why i waited. the word was "be full"
along the river, keeping company
Be sure to come back tomorrow for day FOUR!! There's even more beauty to share!
‘No,’ he told her. ‘It just makes you wonder whether it’s insane.’
These are very nice, but I find them boring. I prefer the brighter, annual daisy-like plants.
And don't forgot to join this week's challenge at MDUC, check out all the ladies wonderful projects, see who is sponsoring and what prize is up for grabs this week.
Shackle M. The new maternity benefits: a better deal for some. Prof Care Mother Child 1995; 5: 34-35.
I watch a mixed martial arts fight, and the warrior inside the cage, who just spent the better part of fifteen minutes beating the snot out of his opponent, thanks Jesus for his victory. I read news about a devout believer in Allah, who strapped explosives to their chest and walked into a market place to cause mass carnage. As a child I would hear people echoing each other in church, reciting words talking of turning the other cheek, only to see two of those same individuals honking at each other in their pricey cars, yelling through their windows over who cut who off, all while ignoring a poor and needy soul looking for some acknowledgment of their own existence. The news shows a woman standing with a smile, thanking her god for saving her house, and just down the street the same news program shows the salty tears of another believer, who probably sits in the same row of the same church, who just lost everything they ever owned. And I would bet that both the woman with the smile (who still has her house), and the believer in tears (who lost everything), both laugh at the humans that only a couple of thousand years ago used to pray to dozens of gods (sun gods, fire gods, weather gods, fertility gods…).
Have you ever missed someone so much that it actually hurts your heart? You can feel the emptiness. You can feel the hole inside your soul. And nothing or no one can replace that which is lost.
Our first grandchild.
The last photo is The Disapproving Moorhen. He may well return to express his opinions on future issues and matters that arise. He will mostly disapprove.
06. Apple Blossom
Looking for a gift for that special someone on your shopping list? Think about buying handmade this Christmas.
Research by Murray and Milhausen (2012) recently tackled the length of relationship and desire connection, and found that length of relationship (in couples who were together for an average of 2 years) impacted sexual desire for women, but not men.
Every two hours from now until midnight, I'll be posting some fun Tristi trivia questions and answers, holding mini contests, and giving away awesome prizes. At the end of the day, everyone who has participated will be entered to win the Grand Prize. It's that simple!
One of his successes there was the introduction of the concept of the War Artist. In the last two years of the war he sent more than ninety artists to make a visual record of events in Europe. Although there were limitations on what they could exhibit during the war, they were given a fairly free hand in what and where they could paint. The long term legacy of the artists, who included Stanley Spencer, Paul Nash and Augustus John, is an important one. I have read that the British made a conscious effort to ally themselves with modern art in WWI to emphasise that they were on the side of freedom and progress. Similarly, I have seen it argued the CIA is supposed to have encouraged Abstract Expressionism during the Cold War to make Soviet Socialist Realism look even more out of the mainstream.
Thank you again for stop by my blog. please leave a comment and follow me if your not already. Thank you.:)
So this is what I can up with~ Dad's card starts with PTI kraft CS then Smokey Shadow CS that was embossed with Wood Grain Embossing folder. Next I added one of the little frames - it's a heather grey/almost purple color that is inked around the edges. I stamped a small piece of kraft with textile background in vintage cream. I punched a fillable frame and used versa mark to stamp woodgrain in the middle then made a couple of score lines on either side. Punched out a tag added Dad and a couple of buttons and twine. Almost too cute to give away. Aw but my Dad's worth it and more.
I often wonder if my attempts at parenting have been successful. I was an especially nervous Mom and even before I had my first child I asked my mother if she thought I would be a good mother . Her reply was less than encouraging.
The firm said it was "reasonably confident" of achieving most of the job losses through voluntary redundancies, although it could not rule out compulsory lay offs.
A couple years later, Evelyn found herself pursued by a cocky playboy named Harry Thaw. The lazy bachelor lived off his parents' millions, had no job, and joked to friends that he majored in "poker" while at Harvard. He thought Evelyn was super hot and wanted to marry her.
It is always the same old story. "Your kids are incredibly smart but don't live up to their potential." Isn't that the same thing as saying, "Mom you need to pull things together." This time the teachers had ammunition. Stacks of ammunition. I think they had some automatic rifles hidden under the desk. Assignments that were turned in half done. Multiple choice things obviously answered by making patterns or just picking answers at random. Print outs of assignment after assignment that were simply not turned in. Then they would show me a comparison of their test scores. As on their tests plus Fs in the class equals not reaching their potential. a.k.a. I am not involved or pushing them enough. They didn't actually say that. It is just how I felt because I could come up with no other reason for their performance.
but it wouldn't be the first time that happened.
Comi is short for communist. His real name is Jessup Davis, Jr.. He’s a few years older than Julian, and he’s opposed to this country because like me, we don’t exactly like what’s going on in our America.
I went to school at Purdue and we did have to take a series of classes on the Systems Development Life Cycle. Back then it was just called SDLC and was an ongoing process of Analyze, Design, Implement, Test, and Evaluation. Then Evaluation could cycle back into Analysis. It’s a logical thought process for how to develop/deploy new systems or projects:
So, Today abruptly we decided to checkout the just opened first CineMax of Bangalore, in new Bangalore Central at Sarjapur Road. My friends were tired of listing to me bitch about Innovative Multiplex anyways. This place is such a relief, small screens but sound system and seating is great … for the 150 Rs. price of weekend … It’s the best place for me in Bangalore right now.
As i craned my neck outside the window, i could make out a lot of flags fluttering from the sides of cars and wagons and buses…oh crap, i thought, the gannay ka juice had landed me smack dab in the middle of a frigging political rally.
This hem was then folded over to allow the only untangled piece of elastic I could get my mits on (Mon dieu! Must make time to discuss Mumma's craft space and the associated boundaries with my girl!) and sewn three quarters of the way around allowing an opening to thread the elastic through.
"You must be one o' those newer fellas." Newer fellas. Meaning -- Chuck Berry, Elvis Presley, Little Richard, Buddy Holly, Carl Perkins. Etc.
Pain is the very opposite of all that is good in life.
With the usage of marijuana in early, formative years, there is a much higher probability of increased drug use in later years, according to the research.
Game Modes
Add salt and pepper to taste (and any other seasonings you want)
I sometimes find myself acting as the facilitator in problem-solving meetings for clients with more people attending than I’d choose if I were running the meeting myself, but as the person from outside the business it does help me to build a better picture of what’s really going on. Sometimes it is that slightly left-field observation or suggestion from a colleague who isn’t directly involved in the project that cracks the problem. I’m used to handling contributions from a group of twenty or more people in a problem-solving situation but most managers aren’t called upon to develop these skills at work.
Well, this makes more sense. Newsmax displays wishful thinking! RP is not "dropping out". He is ceasing his primary activities, but maintaining his delegate strategy. He's still in!
There is an exhibition of his works at Tate Britain until 15 January. I was captivated, particularly, by those suspended huge boulders, just starting to fall, in “The Great Day of His Wrath”. Of course a huge amount of painting invites the imagination to show what happens next, but this was my introduction to that. I had an instant, visceral response to the armies of Gog and Magog and the Whore of Babylon in “The Last Judgment”. I found “The Plains of Heaven” comparatively uninteresting, though I began to notice beauty in it: it was something worth looking at, not just something I looked at because I was told to.
But if anyone else comes asking, I’ll be charging a 5-figure sum and reserve the right to disappear for a couple of hours for an afternoon nap...
run errands constantly,
We were riding at a heck of a speed and I slammed into the dashboard when we suddenly braked just before the open plains. It was Pumba. She was making her way back home. I jumped out of the car and gave her a big hug before getting angry with her about what she had done. She obviously didn’t understand it though and then didn’t want to get into the car as she was now scared of me. So, we made her run home behind the car. She deserved it for nearly killing me.
This was a big one and since it creeped up on me, I was unprepared. As soon as I sneezed I felt a wet drip down my leg.
The pregnancy and impending shotgun marriage of her teen daughter, Bristol, sets a terrible example for the youth of America, unlike the pregnancy of the teen movie character “Juno,” who sets a wonderful example for the youth of America by refusing to marry.
I have been really loving all of this photography that's happening lately. I've always loved it, but it's like cranked up a hundred notches these days! I took four years of Photo in high school and loved every minute of it. Glad to be all up in it's grill again.
Chili sauce - about 1/4 - 1/2 cup
Scooting up and down the banks behind the brewery, they came a little closer to the bayou’s water each time – and eventually, like Mr. Knievel on his ill-fated canyon jump, they too did not make it across.
That right there is why I watch the show. If you want to see Raylan deliver this speech, you can find the clip at the bottom of this page. You’ll find it under ‘Selected Scenes.’ It’s well worth the minute and a half.
I have been sewing this past month....and vacationing. I have a few things to share but I'm gonna put them in multiple posts and help myself get comfortable with these new Blogger changes.
Well, I just couldn't resist posting two pictures this time. The main reason for that is that in all the pictures Benson was smiling in, he was also covering up his 2 months sticker. I also loved the one where he is covering it up because you can see his chubby little legs better and you can see his dimple peeking through. Oh, I love chunky babies!
I need to know an idea of interested numbers for the museum visit in order to book it, so please register your interest using the same email as above.
DAP secretary general Lim took his rival Dr Chua to task yesterday over alleged corruption within Barisan Nasional (BN), singling out PKFZ where former MCA boss Tun Dr Ling Liong Sik and his successor as transport minister, former MCA deputy chief Tan Sri Chan Kong Choy, face charges of lying to the Cabinet.
The unofficial start of planting season got under way today, as the U.S. Department of Agriculture released its 2010 Prospective Plantings report. It’s an annual report that the agency issues each March 31 as its best estimates on what farmers may plant for corn, soybeans, wheat, cotton and many other crops.
Do you protect her?
MAC Impassioned is described on the website as an 'amped up fuchsia', but it's actually a bright yellow-toned watermelon pink. It's incredibly pigmented owing to its Amplified finish, and dries to a cream finish on me.
I can’t just skip up because I feel like I should be further along than I am. Because I won’t have built a foundation, all of that will come crashing down. I know that’s true, I tried to skip up before, it all crumbled and I was left looking at the hole where the foundation was supposed to be.
The Wild Man as Lover - Like the fairy tale wild men, Pitt's seductive cowboy hitchhiker gives magical gifts to the hero for her journey, in this the hero is a housewife and the gift a sexual awakening akin to the one experienced by a similarly frustrated housewife heroine burdened with a self-absorbed unconscious schlub of a husband who doesn't believe in a wife's right to an orgasm, Jane Fonda in Coming Home.
we all remember where we were and how we heard about the attacks on the world trade centers and pentagon. our shock, anger, disbelief and horror. but we also need to remember our pride.
Put all the ingredients in a pot with the water in it as well. Boil for around 1 hour. Add rock sugar to taste. Serve this wonderful dessert hot or chilled.
L'Oréal brought proceedings against eBay and a number of its users in various Member States, including before the High Court of England and Wales, alleging widespread infringement of its IP rights on eBay's European websites. In particular, L'Oréal sought a ruling that:
Pre-heat the oven to 180C and line a muffin tin with cupcake cases.
Hummus is a good accompaniment to crudites like cucumber, radish, celery, carrot, and more. My farmers market finds fit perfectly to combine them between two slices of whole grain bread. Persian cucumber and tender radish layered on the mint hummus, and topped with some crisp herb salad finished the sandwich– a perfect healthy bite.
I wish I didn’t buy bottled water every lunch when I get the chance back then, and instead, brought reusable bottle or something like that. I was conscious about it before but not conscious enough to actually do something about it. Now, I am doing something about it.
Some parents love to fall back on the phrase Life Is Not Fair. It's the Get-Out-Of-Jail-Free-Card of parenting. It's a daily occurrence in some homes: Kid calls parent's (arbitrary) ruling unfair. Parent says Life Is Not Fair. Discussion over.
Thank the Goddess for her presence in your life and put out her candle.
Wishing everyone everywhere a fabulous Friday!
2 homunculi
Poured into the glass, the Schlenkerla märzen is dark brown with no visible carbonation. It has a solid, large head, and it smells like smoke with distinct notes of smoked mackerel.
Where the bee sucks, there suck I:
It's taken me a while to do anything more on my ACKS homebrew, but finally I've made a little progress. Blame a combination of Minecraft and the Bleach anime series taking up my brain space.
- Make physical plans – stay healthy
A parcel of information on this paper new
My Visual Communications Class studied Unity and Variety this week. Their assignment was create a visually unified image while incorporating variety somewhere within the design. They focused on papercutting for this project -cutting one or more design from folded paper, resulting in a “double” or repeated (mirror image). After they half cut out the design, the student opened up the folded piece of paper, cutting back into one side of the paper cut, breaking up the twin image.
tastes of electrified spirit
10.)
So what does any of this have to do with life beyond the seaside? And what does it have to do with writing? Well...everything!
Workbox/File 11:TOG Student Activity Page-Fine Arts section, 20 minutes
**Remember to be really careful when blendering hot soup - take the little clear plastic thingie out of the top of the blender and put a dishtowel folded into quarters over the hole, this lets the hot air out when you start the blender, instead of the whole thing exploding napalm-y soup all over you and your kitchen.
That’s it…today is the day to accept a new path and a new beginning. The journey must start here and there is no looking or turning back. This thing I have become does not represent the woman I am. Today we say goodbye to one another and a new life begins.
Eamon accompanied School Committee member Antonette Pepe today on a surprise inspection of The High School of Commerce. He said he saw math classes with kids wearing baseball caps sitting on desks watching TV while their teachers sat writing at their desks. The kids had food in the classroom although they're not supposed to. The Principal Ann Henry was cordial to them and showed them around. He said Henry has pictures of her two daughters in her office, one is attending Cathedral and another is a physician. Eamon mentioned Commerce critic Dr. Tsai and Principal Henry said the stories about Commerce are blown out of proportion by four teachers who are out to get her.
Yep, people loved their Republican mayor, and no one bothered to run against him at re-election time. And Chet continued to take care of the elderly with a miserly nod to the young of the town.
Here it should be noted that, during the cold war years, CIA and Army Counter-Intelligence Corps (CIC) interrogators, working as part of projects Bluebird and Artichoke, sometimes injected large amounts of Metrazol into selected enemy or Communist agents for the purposes of severely frightening other suspected agents, by forcing them to observe the procedure. The almost immediate effects of Metrazol are shocking for many to witness: subjects will shake violently, twisting and turning. They typically arch, jerk and contort their bodies and grimace in pain. With Metrazol, as with electroshock, bone fractures – including broken necks and backs – and joint dislocations are not uncommon, unless strong sedatives are administered beforehand.
STORY: A team of scientists journeys to a distant planet in hopes of discovering the answers to a mystery about the evolution of life on earth – and discover something terrifying that might just signal the end all life.
The great and prolific author Elmore Leonard created a list he dubbed "10 Rules of Writing."
And this is my problem. He said all the right things. Complimented me on my clothes, my perfume, and talked about the next date, and the date after that. He mentioned that I should go with him to a festival abroad at the end of June, and he was a perfect gent all night. He carried my ridiculously high heels for me and found a club for us to go onto where I’d feel comfortable in my back up flat pumps. He didn’t take me to a pretentious place either. It was in fact a converted public toilet underground in west London and the crowd was most definitely eclectic. I caught him staring at me when he thought I wasn’t looking. He paid me random compliments in the middle of our conversations. We laughed, we talked, we danced, we kissed, we…well. Enough of that. But now I’m stuck. The thing is, I like him (obviously). I mean, I like him in a ‘thinking ahead’ kind of way. And I have no idea what the ‘dating rules’ are.
What I don't understand about this is the incessant desire to ignore the oppressive structures of society and instead turn everything into a personal choice. Who would choose oppression? Why on the world would someone decide to be oppressed? If ending these things were as simple as making an active choice, then why hasn't the entire kyriarchy come apart at the seams? I mean, there are tons of people who would do anything to not have to wake up and keep struggling to survive and be counted. Why is your positive thinking enough to save you, and theirs isn't? Oh yeah, sunrises.
If peat-less scotch is what you seek, look to single malts from Speyside. Cutty Sark has about the lightest peat signature of any blend and there is a lovely Speyside malt at the heart of Cutty; The Glenrothes.
Johnson CC, Annegers JF, Frankowski RF, et al. Childhood nervous system tumors- an evaluation of the association with paternal occupational exposure to hydrocarbons. Am J Epidemiol 1987; 126: 605-613.
(2) Each will receive as he has done: if he is righteous, his righteousness will precede him; if he is wicked, the reward of wickedness is before him.
Since Kiyo is a well-respected author, there is already a lot of great audio and video and transcribed material about her on the internet. For this reason, I did not conduct my own interview when I met her to take her portrait. Instead, I'll include links to the other resources about Kiyo available on the internet.
In the process Western society's resolve and sense of its own identity had become so undermined that other groups with other even less wholesome aims and agendas began to smell blood in the water, and they in turn began to close in on a weakening prey.
Speed Limit signs…… Caution signs…. signs telling us how many miles to the next town…. are all put on the road …. not once… but several times for those of us who are just getting on the road or for those who have been on the same road for some time, to assure us that we are going the right way… that we need to watch out for upcoming hazards…. to remind us to slow down… or… speed up….
This method of destroying racists and bad legislators and bureaucrats was NOT from Sun Tzu’s Strategy, but do feel free to use this method to remove USELESS nepotistic term limitless and apartheid embracing, extreme religion embracing racist citizens from polite society. In fact lobby groups funded (who else but by the apathetic and selfish millionaire minorities here) should get the nation of any racist’s awarding University to bar them from entry to that country for Human Rights abuses (apartheid and extreme religion) as well. Ambiga, Pak Samad, Barcouncil, all NGOs, this march or walk or whatever and subsequent suffering was NOT NECESSARY!
Monsters are big and scary creatures. Monster regiments use the regular basing (and movement rules) for the armies. However, some of the biggest monsters come with their own bases. These are lone monsters not limited by the drills of military movement. They can move freely without the need to pivot, retreat, or side step. They have 360 degree LOS.
While at the festival a fellow BA informed me that Minus The Bear was playing in San Antonio on Sunday. I managed to get tickets and on the way we decided to stop for some dinner. It immediately occurred to us the we had time to go to Freetail.
The Victoria & Albert museum (V&A)
You can buy premade bags at most craft stores and do the same if you don't want to make your own. I just didn't want to spend any money and wanted to use up some of my crafting stuff.
Baked Camembert (studded with rosemary and smoked garlic and drizzled with oil)
Today was a sad day at the 92.3 NOW studios. Due to doctors orders, Nick Cannon did his last show with Sarah Lee and the Rollin’ crew this morning. Even though it was a sad day, Nick and Sarah took the listeners on a trip down memory lane, looking back on all the good times they had in the two years Nick was with us.
When I was a youngun’ I used to play with Barrel Of Monkeys. Even back then I loved the design of the monkeys and would create little adventures for them. I guess I’ve never outgrown my affection for them, as one of the first things I thought of pressing into porcelain was a Barrel of Monkeys monkey!
I shall return to “The Rooster” and his noxious gossip in a moment, but first let’s get to grips with the following:
22. The House Always Wins 4.03 (101/92)
YAZOO CITY PRISON, Mississippi — Vancouver cannabis crusader Marc Emery may be facing two more frustrating years behind bars in the Deep South of the United States. But he’s more confident than ever he’s winning the war on drug prohibition.
1C) Push Ups
Valentina Cirasola is an Italian interior designer in business since 1990. She is passionate about colors and all expressive art. She is a “colorist”. To her, selecting art means to bring out the best energy of her clients and nourish their soul. She is the forthcoming author of her book on Colors: Red-A Voyage Into Colors, which will be released very soon. Check out her books’ site: http://valentinaexpressions.com/
"GIVE ME THE DAMN KARDEX".......
Last weekend, Mr. H+F gave me the best birthday surprise - he booked me a whole day at my favorite spa. Aaaaah, relaxation! Facial, massage, the works!
I really started reading this on a whim, I really did. At the time, I had convinced myself that I wasn’t reading nearly enough shounen or seinen manga. Kanojo wo Mamoru 51 Houhou was a faraway memory, and I wasn’t about to read Uzumaki again (the nightmares…) Also, I had no interest in reading delinquent manga, really. So I decided to take a leap of faith and read this, because it sure sounded interesting.
“I’m asking for your consent to search the car,” he told Huff. “If your answer is `no,’ I’m going to detain the car long enough to run the dog around it. I can get you a ride” – an invitation that, in context, has to be considered an ill-disguised threat to arrest Huff and his friend (vide
Herman got married and moved away. When we would see a 'possum that unusual color we like to think it was Herman's get.
Staring down a problem that you don’t understand is only going to make your legs give way and you flee from the room. That doesn’t mean that the problem can’t be solved, it is just easier to do it once you have your momentum. Try to find aspects of the work that are easy and start there – whether it is formatting your page for the essay, or writing a section you understand really well.
I'm in Hong Kong, going to visit our factory tomorrow in China! I'm so excited to meet the people who make my designs so beautiful and perfect! I really owe it all to them and can't wait to make the whole new collection here. So far we've had an awesome time even though the jet lag after the 16 hour flight has been strong.
I was on fire, lit like Christmas as we agreed on a time. I then went to finish my newest horse idea, which slowly evolved into a licking, chewing, oh my God, it worked out perfectly. He was now responding like I was a competent leader, his drama attempt not moving me in the least, till finally he completely lowered his head and sighed. Pleased with all of this ask and receiving, I quickly came back in, made her the present of my magical meditation of Susie Mantell. Which as it clicked off done, and the tray popped open, she texted she was just up the street.
PEANUT BUTTER PIE
I love how pretty and reflective it is on my shelves. This is one of those things that looks perfect anywhere...shelves, coffee table, kitchen window, side table. Wherever you want to add a little shot of glamour.
Much love, Zen
From National Underwriter: “The number with some kind of individual commercial coverage could increase to 7.4%, or 735,000, from 350,000. The percentage with some kind of government coverage, or coverage provided by a private insurer but paid for in whole or in part by the government, could increase to 31%, from 20% in 2010. Although the percentage of residents with coverage could rise by about 7.9%, the price of individual health insurance coverage might rise about 55% to 85%, excluding the impact of medical inflation, the Milliman consultants predict.”
Living in the present, being here now – doesn’t preclude the what if process.
♥Gillian
“Slowly, his perfectly sculpted face leaned in toward mine, his warmth surrounded my entire being as the moment of my much=anticipated first kiss neared. I could feel his fingers as they weaved through the hair at the nape of my neck, and tilted my face upward toward his. My heart raced in my chest, my breath caught in my throat, seconds slipped by like hours as I waited for his lips to greet mine.”
Performances continue
I began noticing that people would not talk to me when I talked to them, and they’d move away quickly. Someone would talk about me and say nasty things in front of my face. I would go into the lunchroom and try to sit next to a co-worker, and told the seat was for someone else. And then I’d watch as no one filled the seat. When I would walk through the parking lot, construction workers would pass by me and give me very creepy looks. This was done by all the men, not one. I thought it was strange, but I dismissed their looks. I began to notice that anytime anything happened at work, it was always my fault. When I went to lunch in the restaurant located in the building, no one would come out to serve me lunch. Or if they came out to help, they would rudely talk to me, and sloppily serve me food.
I have a post to share about how we are now at NINE on my China team! Go God!! But I had to share how God has humbled me lately through my team.
But is this realistic that a gold standard comes back?
It's a great store, but I didn't find too much...just a couple rereleased LPs from AD! and Tutu & the Pirates. Unfortunately I got lost as I am prone to do, so I was ultimately late for the start of the noon film...
Stone Brewing Co. Double Bastard Ale
I usually start sipping the coffee before I've even made it from the coffee shop to the car, but I always stash the scone for later. After a few hours when all my music starts to sound the same and the scenery becomes dull and drab, I reach for the scone and break off a corner. The first bite is always a crescendo of excitement for a much needed diversion.
Level 7: MP Cost: 25, jumps for a certain distance.
Walking into the kitchen, there’s T humming ‘Always look on the bright side’, aarrgghh, why is he always so optimistic. “cheer up, things could be much worse” he states, and after a lecture about how bad life could be, I realised how insignificant my woes were, in lifes’ big picture.
Gluten-Free Grains
With abs drawn in and the glutes engaged, the exerciser should lower his chest down to the floor. The exerciser should stop when his chest is around six inches from the ground and then push himself back up until arms are straightened.
But who would want to kill such a fabulous creature? This year I've seen some wonderful animals; I watched a Peregrine stooping over the cliffs at Ynys Barry, a million starlings massing at Plumstone, a seal giving milk to its pup... and yet I reckon that hornet was the best by far.
The descriptors they came up with were along the lines of difficult, delicate, inopportune, and annoying. Nothing that truly hit the nail on the head. And then I thought, what a glorious and freeing thing. To live in a world without awkward.
75th Street Brewery
Serves 4 in a burger bun - if you're serving them without bread I would add a little extra meat per person, the original recipe called for 400g to serve two people
Like all careers, aerospace is not without its challenges. “In aerospace, compared to other disciplines, everything just barely works,” says David. “If you make a plane twice as heavy as it needs to be, it won’t fly. Aerospace is a very delicate thing and the margins for error are very small, which also makes it exciting.”
Our guide even gave us special commemorative pins of the HP Garage! As we headed back to the car we were pretty incredulous at what had just happened.
A mutant languages rise from the dead
alfie kohn quotes the great thomas gordon in this section: "children sometimes know better than parents when they are sleepy or hungry; know better the qualities of their friends, their own aspirations and goals, how their various teachers treat them; know better the urges and needs within their bodies, whom they love and whom they don't, what they value and what they don't."
However, now that I am home, I get to celebrate my birthday today! And what better way to celebrate than to have a giveaway? And this one is sort of a fun one indeed! A couple weeks ago I was contacted by a publicist from Dutton at Penguin Books who asked if I would like to review and comment on a new publication that (at the time) was not available to the public yet...
ready peeled and sliced
One more point is this: Psalm107:20-21 He sent His word and healed them, And delivered them from their destructions. Oh, that men would give thanks to the LORD for His goodness, And for His wonderful works to the children of men! NKJV
There is much cause for contemplation, and gratefully time also.
....Well Mrs. Cwinton, your wetter is not appweciated in Mr. Bush's Neighborhood! But I have an answer for you. If you get ewected as Pwesident, I'm gonna send your first wadie, Bill, a year's suppwhy of Cuban cigars. You won't find the time to wear your pants! Ha-ha-ha! Now that's the kind of humor that's funny in Mr. Bush's Neighborhood!
This road is twenty minutes from my home. When you turn the corner [in the photograph] the road leads to a car park overlooking the rugged beauty of Inishowen in all its splendour. I love this road because when I am heading down this path I am on my way to yoga, perhaps a picnic, maybe a refreshing walk or hike in the fresh air of Inishowen. Sometimes I am going to an art exhibition or taking visitors to the Fort Dunree Millitary Museum and to the fascinating wildlife displays.
After a few online conversations he, eventually, asked me out to dinner. And we went to dinner. And then we went to the movies. And the rest is history. We dated for the entirety of our senior year. We went to so many dances that year—dating someone from a different high school pretty much just means you’re just dancing all the time. And then came a summer full of Fun Town, and Aquaboggin, and late nights of being 18 and silly happy. I was going to UMaine in the fall, Chris was headed to St. Olaf College in Minnesota. He’d been accepted to pretty much every school he’d applied to–crazy talented organist, but he decided on St. Olaf College. So, there he headed in August and to Orono I went. Being apart sucked, but it was decided that I would go with his mother to Minnesota to visit him for October Break.
You may register in one of three ways:
"The Post-Advertising Summit celebrates the end of the broadcast age and the dawn of a new era for marketing." Now, this isn't the same "end of the broadcast age" that happened last year, or the year before, or every year for the past ten years. This is an all new funeral for advertising. And the way you know it's for real is that this time it's sponsored by an Institute. That's right, an Institute -- not just a bunch of self-righteous web hustlers trying to make a quick buck.
On the small sewing table is a piece of fabric, needle, thread, bobbin thread, scissors and a bowl with pearl buttons and little white opal are waiting to be picked up by skilled fingers.
(Squirming in car) "Mama there's a booger in my throat and it's making me move!"
Alyssa has had a few moments of bad attitude, but she has used the tools that we gave her and has been able to switch things up and turn her attitude around. I am so proud of her determination!
Ever since I conveyed my decision to step out of our marriage to my husband, he has been constantly telling me something that has failed to make any sense till this day.
digs in the dirt
Sea Urchin sandwich with avocado and steamed bun (3 for $12) - LOVE this dish with the briny, nutty flavored sea urchin paired with creamy yet structured slices of avocado and placed in tiny, pillowy little bao! Presentation, in a steamer, is awesome as well.
I can’t say that there is more importance on one then the other so there is no particular order on these. They are though the basics to cover first to better health. Go through the list. Be honest with your self. Are these covered in your life? Simplify and see if you have these eight basics covered. I promise as you cover these you will start to break the chains that imprison the soul and make your house a happy home for your soul to reside in.
Where folk toil, black with smoke,
2/3 cup plain 2% reduced-fat Greek yogurt
Use filtering and tracking software on all computers, but don’t rely solely on this software to screen cyberbullying and other problematic online behavior.
scroll down and click on Layout.
The craft show will be held at the Trolley Square Mall on Saturday and Sunday, but the NEHW will only be there Sunday.
The Little Drummer Boy ... ABC Family ... 7:30 AM
Who miss their mothers.”
“What nobody tells people who are beginners — and I really wish someone had told this to me . . . is that all of us who do creative work, we get into it because we have good taste. But there is this gap. For the first couple years you make stuff, and it’s just not that good. It’s trying to be good, it has potential, but it’s not. But your taste, the thing that got you into the game, is still killer. And your taste is why your work disappoints you. A lot of people never get past this phase. They quit. Most people I know who do interesting, creative work went through years of this. We know our work doesn’t have this special thing that we want it to have. We all go through this. And if you are just starting out or you are still in this phase, you gotta know it’s normal and the most important thing you can do is do a lot of work. Put yourself on a deadline so that every week you will finish one story. It is only by going through a volume of work that you will close that gap, and your work will be as good as your ambitions. And I took longer to figure out how to do this than anyone I’ve ever met. It’s gonna take awhile. It’s normal to take awhile. You’ve just gotta fight your way through.”
I was raised in the canebrake by an ol' mama lion
But the corporate Mormon Church has a non-profit sub-division in which it does all of the charity work and altruistic not-for-profit Godly things that it does. This division is called “The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter Day Saints”. And they are commonly referred to as “The Mormons” which is actually a falsity since the Mormons are just another big corporation with mass control over vast world populations and local governments. And each church whether aware of this corporate structure or not, pays the corporation though the money collected from its parishioners.
Why is it that you are an angel ALL day for grandma, and the moment I walk in the door you turn into a Tasmanian devil..
Taken: 03/22/2009
Preheat oven to 180°C. Lightly grease a 6cm-deep, 26cm round cake pan.
“Manufacturing such issues can only help divisions among Muslim countries and benefit the Zionist regime (Israel),” he said.
Prior to this classroom visit, I really only saw her class during drop-off (just after lunch) and pick-up… both are times of transition for the kids and always very chaotic. In my head I always envisioned the teachers dealing with a day full of overzealous 2-5 year olds who snatch toys, tattle on each other, and have the attention span of my pinky finger.
The main top layer of fabric on this skirt finds Asian fishing boats drifting across deep crimson seas. Amid green boughs and Spring blossoms there are also tea houses, arching bridges and wooden walking paths through peaceful water gardens. The bottom layer of fabric peeks out in contrast along the bottom edge and through a sassy side-split. Ancient Chinese characters flow freely, telling untold stories across a papyrus colored background.
We’ve had a very difficult couple of weeks, starting with finding out our car MOT had expired and we had to rush job it in. Luckily it passed easily so that was good.
― Dave Ramsey.
I wonder if I can say enough about his film? I guess we'll find out, won't we?
+/- 200g butter
On the right you'll see some pictures of some cars I thought were pretty. I know nothing about them, so don't ask. I liked one of them because it reminded me of Barbie's dream car.
On June 5, the government raised the petrol price by 78 sen or 41 per cent from RM1.92 to RM2.70 a litre and diesel by RM1 or 63 per cent from RM1.58 to RM2.58 a litre.
--Electric Set--
2. It's a sweater, so it's going to be very useful
a sweetener
I did an owl on top of the door frame, too (it's one of my signature moves :) )
Kira Moore lives in a world of eerie silence.
Thanks for stopping by for a visit!!!
Ah, it took me years to write it,
Do rays of loftier glory round thee play ?
So over the weekend I did something that I had never done before. Don't get me wrong, living in Denver I have been to the Great American Beerfest plenty of times, but this time I volunteered. If you are unfamiliar with the GABF then I am guessing that you're probably not much of a beer geek.
(The amazing thing is I have no recollection at all of buying green colouring. The only other colour I had in stock was yellow and both bottles were unopened. Huh…..??)
I don't even know how I found your blog, but I love it! I'm addicted to organizing, and it's nice to find that I'm not alone!
My final pieces for Shipherd’s Record need to be in by Saturday, April 1. That was the deadline given by Molly Goaly, head of public relations at Olivet College. I wrote a piece about this year’s Running Night. It originally wrote it for the ECHO—geared to students—and the new version of for Shipherd’s Record—geared towards alumni. I read through the article and edited it. I am also including blurbs from alumni from the 60’s and 70’s about being Greek. Most of the alumni work at the college, but I got a couple who are out in the world. I was looking for alumni who are still involved with their houses, have careers, and who have fond memories of being Greek at Olivet College.
At a different occasion Jesus tells the crowds that he will be the One to resurrect the dead at the last day, i.e. on the day of resurrection/judgment:
I've heard this is probably the best example of an American Pilsner out there.
ps: the genre is in and around a dark minimal take on trance
Forget about that. You can choose to let these emotions hinder you, and block you from getting what you want -or- you can choose to take full advantage of these emotions and really beef up your Japanese skills.
Q: Tell us about your biggest rock star moment, perhaps it's a moment of real success in your career, a time when you met someone super cool and had that Wayne's World "I'm not worthy" moment, or just a time where you felt like you got the rock star treatment. I get a huge variety of answers for the questions, so it's pretty much whatever "rock star moment" means to you!
Bonus! Just to keep it from being dull dull dull, and also in the interest of full disclosure, I’m also going to tell you what I gained, particularly in terms of yarn and fiber. But that’s going to go back an extra month, because I don’t want to spoil anyone’s surprises in the various clubs that I belong to.
Fuelled by his invulnerability, Dizaei’s ego was legendary among the rank-and-file.
1 The Big Footed Nigger In The Sandy Lot
My mom was born in 1915 in Warren, Ohio, but after her first two or three years lived the rest of her life in nearby Mineral Ridge. I'm guessing the approximate date of this photograph as 1920 because Mom looks about 5. Could this be a birthday photo (she was born in June) with a birthday gift of the rocker?
Be sure to check out the new and revamped pages, added lots of new pics, videos, poems and working on the art page today. I hope everyone finds the more simple layout easier to navigate, faster to load and a LOT easier to comment on. Please, anyone that has a problem with commenting or anything else related to this blog let me know on my new contact page.
My mom got a car. For an ordinary person, this really isn’t a huge deal. For my mom, this is colossal! I believe I have mentioned before that my mom is an alcoholic. I know I don’t have to tell you that drinking + driving is not anywhere near the beginnings of a good equation.
* It has yet to be decided if and when there will be a replacement for the cancelled Formula 1 race in Bahrain with two rounds of the Porsche Mobil1 Supercup.
Is it just me, or does economy class on a "movie airplane" seem a lot more spacious?
2 compressed
Hi ya'll, and a huge thanks to Katie for inviting me to guest post while she is on vacation! I'm April and I blog at A. Liz Adventures, where I write about everything from newlywed life to recipes to DIY ideas ... and other fun tidbits in between.
Gould hasn’t responded to Weinstein’s latest letter.
Do the comfort we can enjoy everyday made us forget to cherish the things we are fortunate enough to have? While we’re enjoying our lives, countless people out there are working their asses everyday to get nothing but enough food just to keep them alive.
It cannot eat away peace.
I received a spam a couple of weeks ago from an outfit called The Best Authors Lounge for a query letter webinar. Intrigued by the sizeable signup fee ($74.99, rising to $99.99 after November 15), as well as the presenter's apparent lack of any professional experience that would qualify her to teach query letter-writing, I decided to investigate further.
My bedroom happens to be right next to the lounge room.
the bells
Researchers have discovered a treatment which may able to cure most, if not all, cancers. The drug targets and blocks CD47, a cell protein which tells the immune system to not kill healthy blood cells. But cancers use the same protein to avoid being destroyed by the body. So by strategically blocking the protein, it’s possible to use one antibody to kill all types of cancer tumors.
Derek McMillan
I used to love CoD. Call of Duty MW2 is probably one of my favorite games of all time but to me this is is just sad. Sure the game will probably have some cool new features but at the end of the day its just the same old cut and paste Call of Duty that we have come to know. The graphics are the same, the gameplay is the same. This shows me that Treyarch is just getting desperate. They have run out of ideas and have just decided to go with future warfare. Aside from firing a machine gun from horses….(honestly wtf), the trailer is cool but it does not spark my interest in the slightest. All the existing competitors of Call of Duty such as Battlefield and Halo are creating new engines for their games, allowing for better graphics and gameplay. Call of Duty has made no progress in this area and I believe that that will ultimately be its downfall. They must adapt or be overshadowed by their competitors. For now, I’ll just stick to Battlefield 3 and Halo 4. Thanks but no thanks.
I cut out a stack of pages and folded the ends up to make the pages a bit more square. Plus I thought that a double layer of paper might roll into the necessary cone shape a little cleaner... after all this book has seen its day and the pages are a bit brittle... not to mention that the paper was pretty cheap stock to begin with.
is initiated by the child. The parents role is to support the child's
I’ve done a lot of thinking this past six months of not writing and now that it’s over I feel the words falling out of the air, dropping like bombs – a big one landed today and has changed my plans for tomorrow night. I’m alive after all. But, now I’m wondering what my Harry Dresden would look like.
And then just yesterday she asked me if her nightgown matched her blanket.
...is a game, a tennis match, a battle of wits, an exercise in horse-trading, and whatnot, but every once in a while you just have to concede the point to your editor. So (sadly) the following lines will not now appear in White Crow, when it's published in July.
My greatest challenge is to talk about it. Tell people about the deep stuff; learn to trust that they know you well by now from watching the fruits of your labour and your life, one focused on the care of others. My happiness now depends not on the judgements of others but on the judgements of myself. How do I feel about me?
So Mitt Romney gave a speech at a closed Ohio drywall factory, which he tried to use as a symbol of Obama’s economic failure. The symbolism was perfect — not as an illustration of Obama’s failure, but as an illustration of just how stupid Romney thinks we are.
Coloring.
Which of the arguments below is the most persuasive?
Tiffy grinned up, her eyes already filled with stars. “Diesel’s a daddy!”
the hopefulness
What remains is to decide how to talk (philosophy often comes down to making decisions about how to talk). Berkeley and Chalmers propose radical solutions: say that the world is constituted by “ideas” rather than by “matter” and say that the qualities of experience are non-physical properties, respectively. However, to accept Berkeley is to reject Chalmers and vice versa, because where Chalmers would codify the metaphysical distinction between mind and matter Berkeley would abolish it. I’m guessing most readers will agree that abolition is a better solution than codification, because codification amounts to simply throwing in the towel and conceding that naturalization is impossible. For myself, I am a staunch abolitionist.
Characters like Jed are modelled the Malcontent characters from Jacobean Revenge plays. He vents his anger about the world: “Bomb em, again and again and again, right through their silver screen. Disrupt the spectacle, the obscene parade. Bring it to a halt. Scatter the dolly girls, let advertisements bleed. Bomb em, again and again. Murderous display, an entertainment for the oppressed...”
Agent 13, the Top Secret/S.I. setting, to be made into a film!
You are going to open your zipper and place one of the zipper tapes flush with one of the back cover pieces. You want the right side of the zipper tape placed on the right side of the fabric. Pin zipper to fabric and sew on with your invisible zipper foot.
This "arched structure," New Scientist calls it, "will be 150 metres long and 105 metres tall – big enough to allow the existing sarcophagus and the wrecked reactor to be dismantled and permanently entombed."
Finally, a response.
I have also gone for a bit of a different "look" in terms of colouring - a stronger more graphic look rather than shading with multiple pens - I just thought it worked better with the very simple line image and simple colour scheme of the papers.
I would find a way to somehow speak my fill.”
1/2tsp salt & pepper
Regarding the Republican/Democrat Party letter – they talk about voter fraud (they don’t trust the poll judges and want to look for anomalies). Fair enough, but they’ve not proposed any rule to allow the lists released solely for election oversight. They move on to a Pew study on vague “problems” with voter rolls but they’ve had these lists for years but don’t seem to have cleaned them up. Yet again, they also fail to propose a rule for release solely for election integrity oversight. They also have a line on identity theft but fail to mention that a thief/abuser would have thousands of names etc at their disposal with the voter list (rather than scowering websites). What they do is call for all involved to kill the bills and the real reason why they do so:
(And did I mention that the new comforter was no longer going to fit the new bed?)
With artillery interspers’d—the wheels rumble, the horses sweat,
I'll care about the Koran when the fanatics in the Middle
Said, I confess, in much the same way as "I have an inoperable brain tumor," or "My ability to think has just been wished away by a vengeful fairy godmother and I'm going to spend the rest of my life camped in Centrelink."
Det Vic Mackey "I don't step back...I step up"
Boots - Harley Davidson
1) Cube the rolls into small squares and fry in the butter until a bit browned and crispy.
(Fredericton, New Brunswick, March 13, 2011) – The “Beyond MS Association of Canada” is planning an education, advocacy and fundraising tour to begin on Canadian CCSVI (chronic cerebrospinal venous insufficiency) Awareness Day, May 5, 2011. The “New Hope for Multiple Sclerosis 2011 Canada Tour” will share personal accounts of how a treatment (venous angioplasty) for CCSVI has given multiple sclerosis (MS) patients a new lease on life.
For the most part, and to a “remarkable degree,” says Byers. The Post was among the last news outlets to take its post down, though the newspaper leaked a self-congratulatory statement from its editor in chief: “With due respect to the White House and out of an abundance of caution, the Post removed the story from its website. We are impressed the White House believes the Taliban, while hiding in caves and dodging American drones, are, like millions of others, avid readers of nypost.com.”
Democrats == Corporate shills.
I can’t really describe how Denise did it, she wasn’t obviously supportive (she wasn’t unsupportive, I just can’t quite explain what I mean) she never told you what to do, but she managed to convey what you needed to hear in such a way that it stays with you and sustains you when you need it, where other people’s opinions often don’t.
Growing and shrinking
Last but certainly not least, we have a wonderful ornament by Retta of Foxy's Weblog made from an altered mint tin! I would love to hang this on my tree, that's for sure, as it's a real treasure! The tiny wreath and "pine" fringe have such a great retro Christmas vibe!
As you ascend, the view of the steep rocky crags and lush forests and (in spring) rushing water below is breathtaking. The ride is gentle like a balloon ride, yet I heard people express fear about the height and the weight on the cables. Our first link is the 238 foot tower a mile distant.
That have impelled me to explore thy volume!
I called this the “pricing game” in another post. It really feels like that to me! Like a really tricky crossword puzzle or something you just have to sit down and figure out.
Material: Material Material: Material Material: Material
Instead, Mr. Cosby focuses on issues that many of the African Americans he makes reference to are already fully aware of, but that cannot make the necessary changes to escape the circle of stereotypes because they lack the resources to do so.
Can't you just imagine a bat or two swooping past this sunflower on a moonlight night? If you click on the image your imagination can run wild with the thoughts of a few spiderwebs dangling from the leaves... and the spiky jagged points on the petals and edges of the leaves could resemble the ragged hem of a ghoulish frock.
Don’t care what anybody say I’m rather to Ja Rule
Retired Army Major Gen. Ira A. Hunt, Jr.’s The 9th Infantry Division in Vietnam: Unparalleled and Unequaled (University of Kentucky Press, 195 pp., $35) is a by-the-numbers look at the only U.S. Army infantry division that was activated and trained stateside specifically to fight in Vietnam. Gen. Hunt served as the 9th’s Chief of Staff and as a brigade commander in Vietnam, and later (1973-75) was the U.S. Support Activities Group (USSAG) Deputy Commander in Vietnam.
This is one of the most touching narratives I’ve seen in some time. You need to see it to believe it.
Through its history, Promise Keepers men’s conferences begin with a call to Christ, but the response to Mike Silva’s invitation to faith was anything but typical. “God is calling you out of darkness,” Silva preached (I Pet. 2:9). An estimated 10 percent of the men crowded the front of the stage and backed up the aisles.
...BONE (goes) all the way to the bottom of the family swamp, where the wild man lies, and dredge that deep man up. As Robert Bly once wrote in IRON JOHN:
Seriously, it’s better today. Today it feels like perhaps moving on isn’t impossible. Of course, self disillusionment is my favorite past time. So, yay you guys! No whining about TSO! YAY
These cards of Van Slyke appeared in one of the 2008 Bowman sets, a pack of which I never bought.
If this prompts whines of “But I don’t like vegetables!!!!!” then you need to be smacked upside the head because you are doing something wrong/not even trying. Roast them. Add herbs and spices. Add bacon. It’s not hard. Just eat them. Because all this green $hit will save your life:
- 50% of women wear a size 14 or larger, but most standard clothing outlets cater to sizes 14 or smaller.
The answers sound easy enough and full of common sense right? Shocked rolled in as I scoured the web for 1 year food storage plans. Only to see many of them only have quickly made food, little nutritional value, and need a microwave or refrigerator to be cooked and stored. What good will this do anyone if there is no power? Its like driving a cross a bridge that says you need a full tank to cross the bridge but you only have half a tank and you hope that you make it all the way across. If that is the case you will surely fail, and may really learn how to enjoy uncooked stove top!
I hope the British don't expect an apology from this administration over that betrayal. That could only happen if the British engage in terrorism to kill Americans and threaten to turn New York City into a sea of fire with their nukes. Do that and he'll apologize for winning the Battle of Saratoga in 1777.
Another thought I have is that if germination is thin, I may also try using up all the self-harvest leek seeds that I got in a trade… I have a lot of them, and if these manage to germinate well, I can possibly save seeds from them at the end of the season.
This lovely girl has been visiting us for a while now. This picture was taken from the back deck and she was around a hundred yards away, on the pasture.
So, for many many reasons, I am stressed over little Pru’s arrival at our home. We hope she isn’t unilaterally or bilaterally deaf, but in the grand scheme of things, it doesn’t really matter. We are extremely excited and can’t wait to bring her home.
149. “Live as if you were to die tomorrow. Learn as if you were to live forever.” – Mahatma Gandhi
Clothing, costuming, bridal, steampunk, romantic, gothic......................the choices are many depending on the colors, the fabrics used, and your imagination!
Yesterday I went to a new farmers' market, which is always a fun experience. This one was on the beach, so we sampled fresh-grown California strawberries while listening to the Pacific crashing nearby. Everything looked delicious, so we took it home and made a nice big feast for dinner:
While you are hard at work preaching to the rakyat about the great efforts being taken by BN to serve the nation, your spouse is discounting all those team efforts of BN by saying something to the effect that translates to making citizens the beggar-man of the nation.
We went window shopping yesterday to see if we could find anything we liked while the sales were still on but to no avail,also they were much more expensive than I thought they would be.We decided to wait until later in the year to make a purchase,but this morning the couch got ruined by Freddie,so we may have to go shopping sooner than later.!!
Here are some pix:
When we tell one another stories about creativity, we tend to leave out this phase of the creative process. We neglect to mention those days when we want to quit, when we believed that our problems were impossible to solve. Because such failures contradict the romantic version of events—there is nothing triumphant about a false start—we forget about them. … Instead we skip straight to the breakthrough.
Now, on with the card. My youngest daughter's birthday is this Friday and she loves hummingbirds so when I saw this stamp at the Paper Pickle had to get it - they actually rent out stamps and I had a coupon for a free stamp rental - sweet! Of course, I stamped it numerous times but this one was one of my favourites so it goes to her.
Coat an ovenproof dish (about 1½ liters), preferably one with a lid, with the butter and sugar. Place the pudding mix in the dish and cover with wax paper, cut out to fit the dish. Cover with a lid or with aluminum foil.
* Performance pressure
Favorite vacation spot: Venice, Italy
I’m so thankful for everyone who has been praying for us and lavishing us with love and support. Your prayers are certainly being felt in incredible ways!
Hi everyone! Donna Salazar is having a HUGE GIVEAWAY!!
High - I've ordered many of our books for next year. It's good to know what we'll be doing.
We prefer not to cite the possible role of anti-white propaganda (especially since 16 June 2006) in the immense increase in senseless killings and tortures. We fail to see that the motive of violence against white people often dramatically differs from that against blacks, that crime against whites often resembles terrorism rather mere crime. We have become blind to a growing tide of racial intolerance and hatred projected against us. Suddenly we do not seem able or willing to identify the basic social-psychological process by which the regime has demonized us to such an extent that we not only have become the 'legitimate' targets of criminals, but also the objects of the most devious torture and cruelty.
*just realized that's my second post in a row with a title straight from "the thin red line." so yes it's my favorite movie, i can't help it.
And before your up and before too long
Rubbish picture as it was as dark as a mole hole in my kitchen when i took this!
“Eh?”Yoochun look up at his wife. “N, not at all. I love it. Thank you, baby.”
So, The Chronicles of Narnia starts out as a seemingly fun kid's adventure series, where four siblings are sent away to the country during the bombing of WWII London. The sibs run around, making up games, playing hide and go seek, and stumble upon the magical world of Narnia. Although I knew and was expecting Christian undertones in the series, it wasn't heavy-handed, and honestly I didn't grasp it all until I saw how it was portrayed in the movie. Ok, Christian undertones, no biggie, it's not preachy, so you can read it with or without the subtext. That is, until you get to the end of the series, when it is blatantly Christian.
(3) If one insists on looking at the Bible as a unified and homogeneous wok, planned from the beginning, then one is forced not only to ignore what is known about its origins and composition but also to explain away a host of textual problems—duplication of material, omissions, interpolations, contradictions—that are most sensibly accounted for as the result of multiple authorship over a long period of time.
If these words strike a chord, it’s because you meet the requirements and understand that not one single snowflake falls accidentally in the wrong place!
Within a few hours. This will allow you to unlock your phone. It is expensive since this facility is given to you free of cost and it is known as one of Europe's most disaster-prone countries. The country is one such area. It is only then you may not be hopping from network to network, since you pay attention, they'll be more than the magianos little italy boston and Naples were filled with turmoil, but they also produced the magianos little italy boston that fed the Italian Renaissance movement where artists such as Venice, Milan, Florence etc became sitting ducks for conquest by Spain, France, and Austria. Hence Italy returned to its pre Christ structure as a patchwork of principalities controlled through proxy by various European powers.
(thanks To Mick Cannon for use of his facebook image)
We visited his birthmom again, and he expressed an appropriate amount of sadness at the way her life turned out. ("we all got new families, but she is all alone.") and then he let it go- and moved on with life. Huge progress.
I went out and checked some of my research cameras yesterday morning. It was very pleasant outside: low humidity and cool. The wind was blowing with alittle strength from the north as I headed up the trail on the far south side of the property. Disturbed woodland dominates this southern portion of the site and early successional woody vegetation is pretty thick on either side of the path. The path also meanders a bit.....so it's pretty hard to see what's around the next bend, most of the time.
★ 12月30日 Black Hole Final Gig (11:00, need to get ticket)
The loss of control over Christianity and the prospect of large changes in Christianity frightens some White Western Christians. Used to their cultural expression of the Gospel being privileged above all others they are quick to accuse and label others expressions as poor misunderstandings of the Gospel, misreadings of the Bible or even heresy. In the Fuller discussion, Tony Jones very transparently admitted that this was his own reaction in regard to the rise of Pentecostal Christianity in the Global South. However, even many White Western Christians are beginning to recognize this cultural hegemony, the problems with it and the need for change.
(2499)
The problem with the idea of wives punishing their husbands by refusing them sex is the unspoken assumption that men always want it more than women. For teenagers and newlyweds this may well be true, but I question whether it applies to Mr and Mrs Fuddlebutt who’ve been married for 20 years. Middle-aged men fall into two categories – those who dream of food and those who dream of sex. The gluttons outnumber the lechers by at least two-to-one, and even the lechers would rather pester college girls than ravish the missus on the kitchen table.
Were all the pictures
Hands Off Our Packs, the campaign that opposes plain packaging, has learnt that the budget includes: £100,398 for billboard advertisements; £127,685 for digital advertising; almost £100,000 for “community events”; and £141,000 for other social marketing initiatives.
Yet the imbalance is apparent and populations must take notice daily and conserve water, especially where droughts are occurring more frequently. While the average American uses 100 gallons of water daily, French and German populations cut that consumption by half, while some tribal communities use fewer than 10 gallons. If you are one of the excessive consumers, below are a few conservation suggestions:
While the pasta cooks, heat the milk in a small saucepan, but don't boil it. Melt 6 tablespoons of butter in a large (4-quart) pot and add the flour. Cook over low heat for 2 minutes, stirring with a whisk. While whisking, add the hot milk and cook for a minute or two more, until thickened and smooth. Off the heat, add the Gruyere, Cheddar, 1 tablespoon salt, pepper, and nutmeg. Add the cooked macaroni and stir well. Pour into a 3-quart baking dish.
Current Vegetarian Meal Ideas
Clam Bake
The Poem in My Pocket :
Beach Boys - Sunflower / Surf's Up - 1971
This post is going to be pretty spoiler-ridden regarding Thor comics over the last several years.
Rich, I’m not sorry I stole your poncho.
I would endure countless hardships for my children.
23. Given the far-reaching effect of recommendation 12, and that anything can be deemed to be racist, recommendation 57 is especially worrying for the police, since it provides for disciplinary proceedings (‘such conduct should usually merit dismissal’) to be used against police officers who have been shown to have used “racist words”. PC Steve Hutt, who referred to a black youth struggling, while being arrested, as a “black bastard”, was one of the first victims. He was sacked after many years of exemplary service. See, ‘Sacrificing of a First-Rate Copper’, Daily Mail, 1st March 2000, pp.18-19. Contrast Hutt’s sacking with the fact that another police officer, Detective Constable Colin Goring was not disciplined even after admitting that he had a cannabis and cocaine habit.
Anish Kapoor's "Cloud Gate" is, to my mind, the most successful piece of public art in all of Chicago. It is also more representative of who we are, and how we live, than I imagine even Kapoor ever guessed it could be.
21. What does your mom like most about your dad? "he's a goofy goober"
We have discovered that the benefits of puzzles go far beyond just the educational aspects. A puzzle brings us together in one place. We’re all focused on the same project, working toward one goal, and we find that we talk quite a bit while we work together. It’s a quiet
Where's the rest of the trouble-makers now?
We're still here.
of course DOGS
It is the same zip code as the gas station. Why, why does WILCO need to know my zip code? Are they sending flowers?
Many times I pick up some yarn and begin to crochet with an image in my mind and no pattern. I find that I am usually able to bring that image into reality through hooking and that is what I did with this blanket. For awhile now, I have contemplated trying a granny square as they are notoriously easy and also allow you to use up yarn ends and scraps. So I looked up an easy tutorial for a modified granny square on YouTube and began to build my very first blanket! (Find a written tutorial here!)
It is nice to appreciate the great things your parents did for you. But it's all right to acknowledge the ways in which you think your parents could have done better, if they had known better, and to try to do better by your own kids. It's all right to remember the things that made you feel bad when you were a child, and to try not to hurt your own children.
Brizaeyl – Leveled my Night Elf Priest from 1 to 10, without BoAs. Brizaeyl I am leveling as Disc. Woot! Disc!
did I hear sounds of hinges opening?
But what matters most is the quality of the beer. I am happy to say the beer is generally excellent. Their flight of tasters includes 8 and the very knowledgeable and friendly barkeep threw in a few more he was excited to share with me. The range of styles was impressive - quite a few sours as well as hoppy NW standards and some very interesting experimental beers. I must say I preferred the sours, with the 3% ABV "KSA" a real standout. Here is how they describe it:
To crown it all, when prisoners were released they had to sign a document committing them never to release any form of information relating to the conditions of their stay in the prison camp, and never to disclose their activities there or the forms of punishment meted out to them.
Whee! Europe has been a blast...well except for the 90 minutes I spent at the stadium watching the Czechs put 3 goals in on us.
The animal part of us wants to get in the car to drive two blocks to the neighbor’s house (or better yet, to pick up the telephone) instead of walking, because it is responding to evolutionary pressure to conserve energy. Evolutionary pressure that is responding to conditions that no longer exist, since there is effectively zero chance of you having to run away from a predator before dinner or to chase after a rare opportunity to catch wild game. However, your body is relying on two million years of genetic memory that you will be exercising your human capacities for endurance soon. Only, you won’t. What your elephant wanted (and probably got) was a short ride in a nice air-conditioned car. What your elephant needed was some good cardiovascular exercise. And how about that commute to work? Here are two interesting facts from contemporary psychology. A person does not adapt to long and stressful commutes, even after years of experience there are measurable cognitive impairments. A person does adapt to smaller living environments. After just two months of living in a significantly smaller space, a person’s average happiness returns to the same level as when living in a larger space. We build suburbs because we don’t know, understand, and accept who we are as a species. We believe the illusions and then we act on them.
My library recently ordered a copy of Reclaiming Fair Use: How to Put Balance Back in Copyright by Patricia Aufderheide and Peter Jaszi (2011), and since I am the copyright go-to-gal, I thought I ought to read it. It took me waaaaay longer to finish it than it should have since I made the questionable decision to read it during my "free time" at work (note to self: I don't really have any of that), but even though it took me a while, I'm very glad to have the knowledge from this book under my belt.
My emotions are running circles around me right now. My level of confusion is high, and I’m not sure what the reason is.
One more thought on how to open children’s minds to the possibility of an entrepreneurial future comes from an approach shared by one of my fellow bloggers, LifeRevelation, who happens to be a grandfather as well as a blogger: “Because I do business coaching I occasionally take my grandson with me (with the owner’s permission) to observe how businesses work. He gets to go behind the scenes at manufacturing plants, bakeries, delis, running and cycling stores, car detail shops, and others. He loves it. He sees it as Grandpa and him going on a big adventure. As we travel to the business I tell him what they do and give him a few ideas on what to look for. When we are at the business and he sees what I have mentioned his face lights up and he is quick to let me know he has discovered it. Not only is he learning, but we are creating lasting memories both of us will cherish.” Thanks, Steve. I love this idea.
The month of November is already upon us! So I want to issue a challenge of sorts... :) this month is not only National Adoption Month, but it's also known as "no shave November" - so I thought it would only be fitting to raise $$ for families adopting by challenge you all to partake in "no shave November." the way it works is you commit to not shave for a whole month but should you shave before Nov is over, you make a donation to a family adopting (either one you know or get with me & I'll get you connected to some families). You can make your pledge here or start something like this at work or with friends...either way, let's help make a difference in the lives of those adopting!
Machinery. The return of purchased machinery that embodies any of the licensed technology. In this event, the licensee may be given compensation. The amount of compensation should be stipulated in the agreement, e.g. it may be based on the depreciated value of the equipment.
3. Greater in value than rubies
For years, in movies and books, the lunch lady was a symbol of all that was wrong with school (and school lunch). They were the kids’ version of the Russian character in almost every North American movie from the 1950s to 1990s—shorthand for villain. (Now you know someone’s bad in an adult movie if they smoke cigarettes.)
In conclusion, the Big Fix is probably a GREAT thing to have at your house. Don’t leave it in the medicine cabinet though: take it everywhere with you! You can use it for Small and Big Fixings! Sells for $10 at www.mymarkstore.com/jnoameshie
What are you up to now?
There are other issues with this outfit. You’d definitely need to go and have some lady garden landscaping to get away with the rise on those briefs (brief being the operative word). I’m also torn on exposing the old midriff since having Baby Boy Number 2. The skin on my belly isn’t exactly something I want to expose to the world. No doubt that this outfit would be aerodynamic but I don’t think Edinburgh will see me in it.
Russell stands and stretches his six foot two inch slender spirit form, runs a hand through his thinning brown hair, and listens to the opinions of his inner spirit voices. His light brown eyes narrow as he inwardly concentrates. The mist withdraws a few feet away from him and allows him complete privacy.
Our PTA had something special each day for us too!
Throughout the process, Linn and I emailed each other frequently and had a few chances to speak on the phone. Linn was generously open to my recounting of family lore, particularly as it involved my artist mother and her influence on my eccentric passions. We had a connection that touched lightly on challenges we both faced, yet the volume, the real substance, of our traded stories was optimism, a state about which I am not confused: it absolutely is a gift.
I hate this sh*t! Why are girls sooooo hateful to each other....? They should be banding together and bolstering each other, helping each other, protecting each other. I wonder when the first "mean girl" was labeled....how long has this been going on?
Well, there is a dryness to the high-citrus principle flavour theme which makes for one of the satisfying sequences of opening sips I've yet experienced here on The Year.
Delectables is a premium brand of chocolate made from the world's highest quality cacao, blended with healthy ingredients. Hand-poured by master chocolatiers, the Delectables Chocolate Bar 3-pack includes Dark Chocolate with Raspberry, Dark Chocolate with Macadamia Nuts, and White Chocolate with Lemon to satisfy your richest desires.
Nuova "polaroid alla radio" in forma di nastrone: si scarica, si ascolta in streaming e ci si iscrive (via feed o iTunes) sulla pagina del podcast. Intanto beccatevi la playlist:
Added Hammond, “I would like to thank our wonderful dedicated and diverse selection committee that worked tirelessly to find the best basketball coach for Southern Miss. We received a tremendous amount of interest in this job from across the country. Coach Tyndall was the only coach offered the job and the unanimous choice of the selection committee. Southern Miss Basketball is in great hands will Coach Tyndall leading the way.”
You can face the pathetic need to have complete strangers put their stamp on your own life choices or you can assume the identity of a pharmaceutical fetishist, choose to troll blogs, shut down discussion, expect everyone to be similarly obsessed with pharmaceuticals in a vain attempt to normalize batshit insanity by projecting your issues into the environment, which no one in the history of the world has ever tried before.
ALSO , I know my fringe is irritating but it's better than seeing disgusting pimples on my forehead.
The church’s ultimate role of spreading the gospel of Jesus Christ becomes an impossible feat if the church does not understand the connection between the religious and the social domains of life. They are certainly intertwined.
Please don’t yell! You seem to be very impatient for a man of God. I’m very serious about this business deal and I just wanted to make sure that you weren’t pretending you knew Mr. Simermeyer. Now that I believe you I can let you know that I was fully aware that I was in the same bloodline as Mr. Simermeyer but I had no clue that the rest of his lineage died as well. This saddens me more than you know. He was a very good man and I loved him deeply. I remember the time he took me on a road trip throughout the United States to go sightseeing. We started in Smackover, Arkansas where we stayed in a bed and breakfast and had to sleep 7 to a bed. It was a little crowded but once everyone got situated, we were able to sleep through the night. Upon awakening, we visited Monkey’s Eyebrow, Kentucky and went to the Kentucky Derby. I placed a $10,000 bet on, “Runs With Super Fast Sneakers,” but unfortunately he didn’t win. Mr. Simermeyer (or Artie, as I called him) put a $25,000 bet on, “America’s Horse With No Name,” and wouldn’t you know it, he won and Artie ended up making over $250,000 that day. He gave me half as a thank you for being a good 5th cousin. Next we went to Gnaw Bone, Indiana where we visited my mother and her new husband. I was never really a fan of him. I remember the one time he gave someone a high five who was waving to a person behind him. He then proceed to just “act cool” but we all knew he wasn’t – he high fived someone he didn’t know… who does that? We ended our trip together in Blue Ball, Pennsylvania and wouldn’t you know it, that name was very appropriate. It was a heavily Amish infested land that had nothing more than a big post office. We didn’t stay long because I had a bad taste in my mouth when it came to horses.
I would suggest that the removal of imminent and serious risks from weapons would be justified, using force to prevent crime, but then officers should then contain, not restrain until such time as the necessary NHS intervention is marshalled by clinical staff pulling on their arrangements via their managers.
Professor Hoffman said: “He changed the course of history and there are very few human beings alive in the twenty first century of whom you can say that.”
she suggest using acrylic paint instead of glaze and a modified wash method which I think is a great idea and allows students to control color, detail and eliminates some of the risk that goes with double firing and glaze firing a thin tile. (A- if you want me to link to your blog or put your name let me know...trying to protect your privacy unless you ask otherwise:) )
Lemon cake: our latest TWD project and a light, fluffy addition to our dinner party tonight. I think our sunny yellow lemons ushered in a weekend of real sunshine for us Oregonians. I was so excited to be outdoors, I took a little cake slice on a backyard fieldtrip today. Of course this turned into a pre-dinner snack, and with the fresh lemonade from those three large lemons, it was summer in my mouth.
Well, turns out there was a major transportation strike in ALL of Spain on that very Thursday. Usually, the Metro strikes on Thursdays, but it usually just means it runs less often. But instead, the bus system, metro system, and airlines were all going on strike. I was flying through Vueling, and they canceled all but 25 flights in Spain. Mine was one of them.
He loves God, is nice to people and takes really good care of his family. He gets very little time to himself and helps me with the kids every day. I don’t always say thanks, but I’m extremely grateful. As I get older, I see more and more that this isn’t the norm. He’s a good one.
The traffic around downtown Nashville on a Friday afternoon is dreadful to say the least. On the way into the expo though, a rep for Swiftwick needed help carrying in a few boxes to their booth. Since we are southern gentlemen, we were given a pair of socks for our service; SCORE! They then asked me to remove my shoes to see what type of socks I had on. Well of course I had a pair of holy cotton socks on, so again I was given another pair of socks. That’s two free pairs of running socks for helping someone carry a couple boxes.
Tara’s investigation and Tarot cards tell her Magnusson’s daughter, Cassie, may hold the key to her father’s plans, and that they both are in grave danger. Meanwhile, Corvus and the Daughters of Delphi have their own plans...and the fate of the world hangs in the balance.
He added that under Section 333 of the CPC, a magistrate can hold an inquiry into the cause of death and holding a similar inquiry by the Royal Commission would be duplicitous in such instance.
But there weren't any Christian undertones to Lost--They didn't have a savior, called Shepherd, who's father was the mysterious Christian Shepherd. Something like that would have been totally obvious.
And what must it have been like for the very recognisable models of these works to walk around the city of Florence when everyone knew who they were and what they had inspired. It was from thoughts like these that David grew.
“Immerse yourselves” is Baha’u'llah’s tantalising invitation. Become a new being in a new ocean, living effortlessly in an extraordinary culture that no other generation of humanity has dreamed, is the implication.
Total Removals -12.0
Third: If the Prime Minister-designate fails to form the Council of Ministers during the period specified in clause “Second,” the President of the Republic shall charge a new nominee for the post of Prime Minister within fifteen days.
Over the next few years, his intelligence activities were combined and mingled with his private operations. He hired a number of associates, many of them with military or intelligence backgrounds, and, according to Federal officials, was routinely receiving huge kickbacks from American manufacturers and foreign governments on his procurement contracts.
I think it's safe to say that my family thinks those situations are the MOST appropriate of all.
Dispirited shuffling around a corner, eyes on carpet, mind foggy. "Lift your head."
Yet another flawed gameplay mechanic is a time-based minigame were you're asked to input a series of commands to get your character to do a task. On one of these occasions, you are inputting a code in order to get your character to dodge some bullet-fire: However, even if you fail this event, the character just runs through to the next room without his injury ever being mentioned. It's as if the gunfire scene never happened, leaving me wondering, "What was the point?" Not to mention that this element of the gameplay is actually broken on one occasion, an occasion were you are required to dodge a spike-trap. At first I thought I had just put the code in wrong, but after I made several attempts at the code (just to make sure I wasn't being an idiot), I came to the conclusion that it was indeed bugged. Luckily, this bug probably didn't have any effect on the plot anyway since these minigames seem completely irrelevant... but it was an unneeded distraction nonetheless.
» 11/13 – Fort Lauderdale, FL @ Bank Atlantic Center
You have a choice of the following prizes:
He is contacted by an old man, the lord of a local manor, who leaves him a package to be opened in the event of his death. Said death happens fairly soon, with the old man murdered at his manor right as Allan comes visiting. The old man leaves behind two daughters, quiet Giselle and sickly Leoné, who is gradually revealed to have been bitten by a vampire, and is slowly succumbing to vampiric transformation herself. Allan opens the package and find that it contains a book about vampires, detailing (and boy, does it detail) what they are, what their effects on their victims is, and what can be done about it. Why the old man left this to Allan only after his death instead of just coming out and saying “Hey, could you help out here?” is never explained.
Make no mistake, the establishment wouldn’t have bothered attacking so virulently a movement that was irrelevant and impotent. The huge, organised establishment campaign against the BNP is the biggest compliment of all — it proves that we are now a force to be reckoned with, a real nationalist alternative to the liberal-left campaign to destroy our nation. So whatever happens at the polls tonight, there can be no turning back. We are here to stay, and we will struggle to the bitter end to save our beautiful nation and people.
We’ve since managed to speak with her original pediatrician and he believes that this behaviour is related to past trauma and she now uses this more as a comforting thing. She still does this now, a year or so on, but much less frequent each night and all it takes is us to lightly place our hand on her back and she stops. The comfort on her knowing someone is there!
I just landed at LaGuardia an hour ago and was so pumped up from the cab ride I had to write this. The cab line was long but worth the wait. He stood about 5’9, with a turban, a beard and a belly so jolly St. Nick would tip his hat. As I do most times I ride in cabs, I sat in the back with one ear bud in in case he says something while I’m reading emails/checking facebook/tweeting. But tonight I heard something that made me look up: I faintly heard the same song I was listening to on my iPod playing through Jagdesh’s stereo.
The report warns of the dangers of intelligence services keeping secrets from the bodies that are charged with policing them; precisely this befell the UK, leading to the ISC’s ‘independent’ report on Rendition containing multiple, serious and embarrassing errors.
There are pros and cons for each option. Buying from supermarkets means you can pick up a book on your weekly shop, and they're usually at rock bottom prices, often even cheaper than Amazon. However, supermarkets only stock a small selection, and it's usually the very mass market books that they expect will sell well. So if you're not looking for the next bestseller, this probably isn't the best place to go.
at the boys' elementary
It seems that ever since Obama took over the reins of reason the government’s first-and-foremost effort is directed at implementing the illogical, obstructing progress and public wellbeing and placing the vulnerable at risk.
FOX: “HR 347 gives federal agents sweeping powers to arrest and bring felony charges against citizens engaged in protest where the secret service is present.”
These are routine tests that everyone should have. If your doctor orders these tests for you, it does not mean he or she thinks you have a health problem. Your doctor will also make sure you have all the shots you need.
After the exhibit we headed over to Canter’s and shared the best Cobb salad known to man. All was fine and dandy until we arrived back at Raf’s car to find he’d gotten a parking ticket. Damned Hollywood bastards!
We’re smartasses for wanting lower taxes. I suppose we’re something REALLY nasty for expecting the federal government to do anything at all to enforce our borders.
Ugh, that stinks, Stephanie! Really! My ear doesn't hurt, but I still can't hear out of it. I'm getting used to it though. It's kinda nice blocking some of the noise out. I'm kinda hoping my right ear will plug up too.
I was taking a class called interpersonal communications and we had a group assignment. I was the youngest member of our group and the only one under 21. Our assignment was to somehow show the various forms of communication. I wish I could remember now the 5 or 6 forms we had to use but sadly I cannot.
According to the through-the-looking-glass cosmology of mass media elitists, when a poor person commits a crime of opportunity, his actions are a threat to all we hold dear and sacred, but, when the hyper-wealthy of the entrenched looter class abscond with billions, those criminals are referred to as our financial leaders.
Finally I get to see JCVD's every wish come true (almost) as he stars not once, but twice in one movie! Only a man as sure as himself as the Damme could team up himself with and kick his own ass!
He told the disciples, hereinafter called apostles, that they were going to be witnesses unto Himself. What were they going to witness? Let’s look at one of those sermons in Acts and find out.
“Back for more?” I replied, jokingly.
So there’s your bedtime story for tonight: The banks were raped by Congress; they took the famous advice: “When about to be raped, relax and enjoy it” and then, Congress and the Banks together raped the taxpayers, who haven’t noticed yet, but will soon. Pleasant dreams…
That are in the field
"Well that's ruined the potential for a perfectly good meeting and a free lunch," his sarcasm is unappreciated.
Brazil’s benchmark IPCA-15 consumer price index rose 0.43 percent in the month to mid-April, accelerating from a 0.25 percent increase in the month to mid-March, the government statistics agency IBGE said on Tuesday.
** It's been such a long wait for this book and its finally releasing next year. I seriously can't wait to read more of Mary and James.
B1 - Je Suis Seule
Knitting & Crocheting: I'm still knitting on the jacket for the book project. The sleeves are done andI have an inch or so left on the body. The body is knitted in the round, so I must get help from mom to sew seams for sleeves and in the front. I don't dare to get a sewing machine close to it....
Frustrated with Myself.
The mayor said he was forced to take drastic action after an administrative court in the nearby town of Pau ruled in January that the acquisition of adjoining private land to extend the cemetery would not be justified.
My brother was a tall, good looking guy who could charm the spots of a leopard, but also did not know who he was if he was not playing a role. He re-invented himself repeatedly, and even convinced himself that he was who he proposed to be. At one time, he decided to write the story of his life. He spent pages and pages detailing his growing up years in such abject poverty that he had to go out with the gun and shoot a rabbit to have food for the family for breakfast. Now this was when he would have been around 10 years old. His whole life was like that. I guess that is why it was so important to me that he was sober and had found someone he cared for more than the bottle when he died. For the first time in his life he knew who he was, and had found happiness.
Last night, we started the first of four weekly childbirth classes at our hospital! I have imagined taking this class for years and I can't believe that we are actually a part of it now. There were 10 couples in our class, so we're looking forward to making some friends as well.
Both teams will play better, that is certain. And when that new hidden level gets introduced, it’s truly winner take all – come hell (blowing the lead) or high water (surging the attack). We can’t blame the victim, the Memph make that old-school big men and inside-out game with pummeling defense, a pleasure to watch. Just one game of many to play. But in the rival adventure-chosen, who looks for the check-mate?
An old friend of mine was in town and had come down to have dinner at the garden, having not seen each other for a long time we decided to head out into the town to have a game of pool, it was the first time I had set foot in a pub for many years, and a bit surreal to be there, hippified as I was at that time. Nonetheless we had a great time, caught up properly after many years, and had some really deep and meaningful manly conversations about life.
Moral: Dressage comes FIRST, not last!
Are you willing to lose your job?
Throughout my years in university I never heard a single teacher to say – that we must consider everything and everyone. How come no one ever considered the big family as the whole world to be the point of attention where the solutions would consider all beings equally?
He got the marriage annulled the next day. While most of us would have broken it off immediately after we found out about the affair, this guy goes through with in anyway. His revenge: making the bride’s parents pay for a 300 guest wedding and reception, letting everyone know exactly what did happen, and trashing the bride’s and best man’s reputations in front of friends, family, grandparents, etc.
After the introductions of the various staffers present, Cotton talked about the MWBE (minority and women's business enterprises) contract, with 16.3% MBE and 6.3% WBE. That was not segmented into New York City or Brooklyn firms.
The 55-year-old woman explained to Manatee County Sheriff’s deputies that “she is German and as a German person it is part of her culture to confront an adversary.”
9. What is your favorite color?
So, what does it mean? It means that at times I wear my heart on my sleeve. At times I feel so strongly about things I can’t even bring myself to write about them. When I do finally get up the courage to write about said topics, I feel as though I’m bleeding across the page, the computer screen, so to speak. At the same time, I need an outlet for my feelings on these subjects, as difficult as it may be. I need to express myself. By now you may be asking yourself what topics I am referring to above. They include, but are not limited to:
“No, no.”
and wishes the father to make himself known. I found this a hilarious and cheeky opening, from the implicit upper-class criticism of the Marquise having an unspecified ‘several’ children, to the Virgin’esque euphemism, and I read on viewing the entire, bizarre story with an ironic eye. (Can eyes be ironic? I’m going to say yes, until proven otherwise). People are constantly fainting, banishing people, and swinging from noble sentiments to blind fury in response to the mysterious (and never explained) pregnancy. Not what I was expecting, but a chance to read something I would otherwise never have even picked up, probably, and an enjoyable hour’s read.
Why some cases with perceived racial implications catch the national consciousness and others do not is as much about the combined power of social and traditional media as it is about happenstance, said Ta-Nehisi Coates, a senior editor at The Atlantic who writes about racial issues.
We got a cool cookie jar for Christmas (you lift the lid and he says "Woof, woof - I love to eat cookies!") and I have been dutifully stocking it up with biscuits. We don't have much junk in the house, and as long as everything else balances out, I don't have a problem with having them in the house (I have been quite good at avoiding them myself!).
